http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/I/IRAQ?SITE=MSJAD&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AM EDT Iraq suicide blast leaves up to 25 dead A-P correspondent Steve Hurst reports there's been a suicide bombing west of Baghdad. (watch for dating) Chaotic Scene in Baghdad on Memorial Day Searching With Missing Soldiers' Platoon A War Widow's Story The Toll: Coalition Casualties Since March 2003 How MySpace is Changing the Face of War Al-Sadr's Followers Becoming Less Unified end interactive icon section --> Latest photos from Iraq Cease-fire eyed to stop violence in Iraq Bush calls for global emissions goals Iraq suicide blast leaves up to 25 dead Turkish general: Ready for PKK strike Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Executive Summary: DOD Inspector General on Pre-Iraq War Intelligence Activities(2/9/2007) Unclassified National Intelligence Estimate Summary on Iraq (2/2/2007) Inspector General Report on Iraq Reconstruction (1/31/2007) (AP) -- A suicide bomber hit a police recruiting center Thursday in Fallujah, killing as many as 25 people, police said. The U.S. military said only one policeman was killed and eight were wounded. U.S. forces backed by helicopter gunships clashed with suspected al-Qaida gunmen in western Baghdad in an engagement that lasted several hours. The American military also reported the deaths of three more soldiers, two killed Wednesday in a roadside bombing in Baghdad and one who died of wounds from a roadside bomb attack northwest of the capital Tuesday. At least 122 American forces have died in May, the third-deadliest month of the Iraq conflict. U.S. forces also continued a search for five Britons who were kidnapped Tuesday in Baghdad, as well as for two of its soldiers who have been missing since a May 12 ambush south of the capital. The Fallujah suicide bomber killed at least 10 policemen in the attack, which occurred about 11 a.m., according to a police official in the city who spoke on condition of anonymity because he was not authorized to release the information. The rest of the dead were civilians, many of them in line seeking jobs as policemen. He said as many as 50 were wounded. Fallujah General Hospital had received 15 bodies and 10 wounded, according to a doctor there, who would not allow the use of his name because he feared retribution. The physician said he believed other casualties were taken to the nearby Jordanian Hospital and private clinics. A member of the Fallujah city council, who also asked for anonymity for fear of attack by insurgents, said there were at least 20 killed and 25 injured. The coordination of information in Fallujah was particularly difficult because the mobile telephone system has been working only sporadically. Maj. Jeff Pool of the Multi-National Force-West said the Anbar province governor's office and the provincial police put the total number of dead at one Iraqi policeman, with six police and two civilians wounded in Fallujah, 40 miles west of Baghdad. Police said the bomber detonated explosives in his vest at the third of four checkpoints, standing among recruits who were lining up to apply for jobs on the force. The center had only opened Saturday in a primary school in eastern Fallujah. The U.S. military and Iraqi army and police were running the center along with members of Anbar Salvation Council, a loose grouping of Sunni tribes that have banded together to fight al-Qaida. Police stations and recruiting posts have been a favorite target of Sunni insurgents and al-Qaida throughout the war. The fighting in western Baghdad's Amariyah neighborhood exploded after residents called for U.S. help. Members of al-Qaida, who consider the district part of their so-called Islamic State of Iraq, were preventing students from attending final exams, shooting randomly and forcing residents to stay in their homes, according to an official of the district council. He spoke on condition of anonymity, fearing retribution from al-Qaida. Clashes continued into the afternoon, and the council official said the al-Qaida leader in the region, known as Haji Hameed, was killed and 45 other fighters detained. There was no immediate word on the fighting from the U.S. military. U.S. forces, meanwhile, pressed on with the search for five kidnapped Britons, and a procession of mourners, some of them women wailing and beating their chests, marched through Sadr City behind a small bus carrying the coffins of two people who police said were killed in a U.S. helicopter strike before dawn. The U.S. military said it had no report of airstrikes in Sadr City and that there were no civilian casualties in the second day of a search for the Britons, who were abducted Tuesday from a Finance Ministry data processing building in eastern Baghdad. A U.S. military statement, however, said U.S. and Iraqi forces had arrested two "members of the secret cell terrorist network" in Sadr City. There was no mention of fatalities. AP Television News videotape from Sadr City showed the coffins of the victims atop a small bus with men and women walking behind, crying. A young boy could be seen sitting next to the coffins. A car in the area was punctured with big holes, as if hit by an airstrike. A police officer in Sadr City, who refused to allow use of his name because he feared retribution, said the helicopter hit a house and car at 4:30 a.m., killing two elderly people sleeping on the roof of their home - a common practice in Iraq's extreme heat through late spring and summer. The officer said a 13-year-old boy was wounded. Also in Sadr City raids, which the U.S. has been conducting with a select unit of Iraqi army forces, Shiite cleric Abdul-Zahra al-Suwaidi claimed his home was raided and ransacked by American forces at 3 a.m. Thursday. The military said it had no report of the incident. Al-Suwaidi, who runs the Sadr City political office of radical cleric Muqtada al-Sadr, said he was sleeping elsewhere at the time of the raid, expecting that he would be targeted. He said his home was badly damaged and a small amount of money was taken. Dozens of U.S. Humvees and Bradley fighting vehicles had taken up positions around Sadr City at nightfall Wednesday. The five kidnapped Britons included four bodyguards working for the Montreal-based security firm GardaWorld and one employee of BearingPoint, a U.S.-based management consulting firm. In Washington, Brig. Gen. Perry Wiggins, deputy director of operations for the Joint Chiefs of Staff, said the military believed a helicopter that crashed Monday north of Baghdad was brought down by small-arms fire. The Islamic State of Iraq, an al-Qaida front group, claimed responsibility. Wiggins also said that more than 100 patrols a day were being launched to search for two missing troops who vanished after a May 12 ambush near Mahmoudiya, south of Baghdad. Four Americans and one Iraqi soldier were killed in the attack and the body of another American was later found in the Euphrates River. "Our determination and resolve to locate our missing soldiers is unwavering," Wiggins said.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/I/ISRAEL_PALESTINIANS?SITE=MSJAD&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AM EDT Abbas, Olmert to try to mend cease-fire Israel Steps Up Attacks on Hamas Abbas, Olmert to try to mend cease-fire Olmert weighing peace talks with Syria Israel bars burials in Old City cemetery Group: Gaza students need freer travel Peres to run for Israeli presidency Conflict in the Middle East CITY, Gaza Strip (AP) -- The Israeli and Palestinian leaders will meet next week in the Palestinian territories for the first time in a bid to restore a shattered cease-fire in the Gaza Strip, a senior Palestinian official said Thursday. The announcement came amid a slowdown in violence after two weeks of fighting between Palestinian rocket squads and Israeli forces. The fighting is expected to dominate the agenda of next week's meeting between Palestinian President Mahmoud Abbas and Israeli Prime Minister Ehud Olmert. "The president is working night and day for a mutual, comprehensive cease-fire," said Nabil Abu Rdeneh, a top aide to Abbas. Abu Rdeneh said next week's summit, scheduled for June 7, "is expected in the Palestinian territories." Officials would not say where, but in the past they have mentioned the West Bank oasis of Jericho as the likely venue. While the two leaders have held a series of meetings over the past year, the Palestinians haven't hosted any of the gatherings. Olmert's spokeswoman, Miri Eisin, said a West Bank meeting is "a possibility," but said the date and location still have not been finalized. Olmert and Abbas promised Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice in March to meet every two weeks with the aim of moving beyond day-to-day issues and begin discussing the outlines of a final peace agreement. However, the men have met just once since then, in April, and next week's talks will focus on the fighting. A five-month truce in Gaza unraveled earlier this month when the Hamas militant group began firing barrages of rockets into southern Israel, prompting Israel to respond with a series of airstrikes. More than 50 Palestinians, most of them militants, and two Israeli civilians have been killed. In the latest violence, Israeli aircraft attacked a Palestinian rocket-launching squad in northern Gaza. No injuries were reported. "We will actively pursue and hit these rocket launchers as well as those who operate them," said David Baker, an official in Olmert's office. Despite the flareup, there were signs of a slowdown in fighting. Hamas' military wing, which has been responsible for most of the recent rocket fire, said it has not launched a projectile in 48 hours. "Perhaps there is an unannounced cease-fire," Abu Rdeneh said. The smaller Islamic Jihad group claimed responsibility for Thursday's rocket fire. In a separate incident, Islamic Jihad said two members were slightly injured in an Israeli artillery strike. But the army denied involvement. Still, the number of rocket attacks has sharply dropped in recent days. Israel resolved on Wednesday to keep striking Gaza rocket squads and said it wasn't negotiating a truce with radical groups. Israeli officials believe the Israeli air campaign is the reason for the reduced rocket fire. Abbas, a moderate who favors peacemaking, has been pushing Hamas to restore the Gaza cease-fire. But he has been ineffective in halting militant attacks. Abbas' Fatah movement and Hamas are partners in the Palestinian coalition government. That partnership is extremely fragile, however, and Hamas began attacking Israel in an apparent attempt to halt a fresh wave of Palestinian infighting. Abbas has proposed a truce agreement that would commit Gaza militants to halt their rocket fire for a month to permit negotiations on a more comprehensive cease-fire including the West Bank. Militants have said a truce is out of the question as long as Israel keeps up its attacks and refuses to bring a truce to the West Bank, where it frequently conducts arrest raids. Israel has so far rejected the notion of applying the truce to West Bank, especially in light of the latest round of attacks from Gaza. Meanwhile, Hamas and Fatah are expected to meet next week to discuss shoring up an internal truce called after this month's infighting, which killed more than 50 Palestinians, said a senior Egyptian security official. Both sides have sent representatives to Cairo to individually speak to Egyptian mediators about the reasons for the latest outbreak in fighting, and the possibilities of coming to a truce with Israel. The two sides are expected to agree to form a committee that will include an impartial Egyptian observer to call judgment on violations of the truce currently holding between Palestinians, said Lt. Col. Burhan Hamad, head of the Gaza-based Egyptian security delegation. "But it's not a guarantee against fighting," Burhan warned. Although the internal truce has mostly held, mistrust runs deep. Both sides have welcomed Egyptian involvement. "We want to get out of mutual accusations through the refereeing of a third party, trusted by both sides, and that is the Egyptians," said Mohammed Dahlan, a Fatah strongman in Gaza, speaking on an Arab news television station.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/R/RUSSIA_PUTIN?SITE=MSJAD&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AM EDT Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race Russian diplomat: New arms race starting U.S. senators back missile defense plan Russia says new ICBM can beat any system Putin blasts U.S. missile defense plan Latest Photos from Russia (AP) -- President Vladimir Putin said Thursday that tests of new Russian missiles were a response to the planned deployment of U.S. missile defense installations and other forces in Europe, suggesting Washington has triggered a new arms race. In a clear reference to the United States, he harshly criticized "imperialism" in global affairs and warned that Russia will strengthen its military potential to maintain a global strategic balance. "It wasn't us who initiated a new round of arms race," Putin said when asked about Russia's missile tests at a news conference after talks in the Kremlin with Greek President Karolos Papoulias. Putin described Tuesday's tests of a new ballistic missile capable of carrying multiple nuclear warheads and a new cruise missile as part of the Russian response to the planned deployment of new U.S. military bases and missile defense sites in ex-Soviet satellites in Central and Eastern Europe. He assailed the United States and other NATO members for failing to ratify an amended version of the 1990 Conventional Forces in Europe (CFE) treaty, which limits the deployment of heavy non-nuclear weapons around the continent. "We have signed and ratified the CFE and are fully implementing it. We have pulled out all our heavy weapons from the European part of Russia to (locations) behind the Ural Mountains and cut our military by 300,000 men," Putin said. "And what about our partners? They are filling Eastern Europe with new weapons. A new base in Bulgaria, another one in Romania, a (missile defense) site in Poland and a radar in the Czech Republic," he said. "What we are supposed to do? We can't just sit back and look at that." Putin and other Russian officials have repeatedly rejected U.S. assurances that the planned missile defense installations are meant to counter a potential threat from nations such as Iran and pose no danger to Russia. Putin reaffirmed his warning that Russia would opt out of the CFE treaty altogether if NATO nations fail to ratify its amended version. "Either you ratify the treaty and start observing it, or we will opt out of it," Putin said. In remarks clearly directed against Washington, Putin blasted those "who want to dictate their will to all others regardless of international norms and law." "It's dangerous and harmful," he added. "Norms of the international law were replaced with political expediency. We view it as diktat and imperialism." Russia this week initiated an international conference to be held in Austria in early June to discuss the situation around the CFE treaty. Putin described the tests of new missiles conducted by Russia on Tuesday as a necessary response to the Western action. "There is no reason to fear these actions by Russia, they aren't aggressive. It's merely a response to tough and unfounded unilateral actions by our partners," he said. "These actions are aimed at preserving a global balance." In one missile test Tuesday, a prototype of new Russia's intercontinental ballistic missile, called the RS-24, was fired from a mobile launcher at the Plesetsk launch site in northwestern Russia and its test warhead landed on target 3,400 miles away on the Far Eastern Kamchatka Peninsula, officials said. Russia's military also tested a new cruise missile based on the existing short-range Iskander missile. "We will keep modernizing our potential," Putin said.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/A/AFGHAN_HELICOPTER_DOWN?SITE=MSJAD&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AM EDT 5 Americans among 7 dead in Afghan crash Chopper Attack: 7 Military Killed in Afghanistan A-P correspondent Jason Straziuso (straz-YOO'-soh) reports the Taliban claims it downed the helicopter. Landmine Education Becoming a Priority in Afghanistan A Children's Oasis in Kabul Rebirth of Afghan Art Kabul: Five Years After the Taliban's Fall 5 Americans among 7 dead in Afghan crash NATO says copter down in Afghanistan US general: Army avoids civilian deaths American remains in Afghan jail General: U.S. airstrikes killed Taliban Afghanistan (AP) -- NATO troops on Thursday secured the wreckage of a CH-47 Chinook helicopter apparently shot down by Taliban militants, an attack that killed everyone on board - five U.S. soldiers, a Canadian and a Briton, officials said. NATO said troops going to the crash site in southern Helmand province were ambushed by enemy fighters, and the unit called in an airstrike "to eliminate the enemy threat." It did not say if the troops were from the U.S.-led coalition, NATO's force or the Afghan army. One civilian was injured by gunfire. Maj. John Thomas, a spokesman for NATO's International Security Assistance Force, said there would be a full investigation into Wednesday's crash. "We will try to determine everything that happened and to fully investigate the site," he said. A U.S. military official, who insisted on speaking anonymously because the crash was still under investigation, said initial reports suggested the helicopter was hit with a rocket-propelled grenade. A purported Taliban spokesman, Qari Yousef Ahmadi, claimed in a phone call to The Associated Press that militants shot the helicopter down in the province, the world's largest opium poppy-growing region where combat has been heavy in recent months. Ahmadi did not offer any proof for his claim, but he specified the helicopter crashed in the Kajaki district hours before NATO reported that information. Kajaki is the site of a large U.S.-funded hydroelectric dam now being repaired so it can provide electricity to the southern city of Kandahar. British troops, who make up the bulk of the forces in Helmand province, have been engaged in fierce fighting around the dam protecting it. The Chinook, a heavy transport helicopter with two rotors, can carry about 40 soldiers plus a small crew. The fact it was flying at night suggested the aircraft might have been carrying troops on a nighttime air assault. The NATO force, which is responsible for a countrywide counterinsurgency campaign, has 37,000 soldiers, including about 14,000 Americans. There are 12,000 U.S. troops in the separate coalition, which trains the Afghan army and conducts Special Forces anti-terrorism operations. Helicopter crashes in Afghanistan have been relatively rare. A Chinook crashed in February in the southern province of Zabul, killing eight U.S. personnel. Officials ruled out enemy fire as the cause. In May 2006, another Chinook crashed attempting a nighttime landing on a small mountaintop in eastern Kunar province, killing 10 U.S. soldiers. In 2005, a U.S. helicopter crashed in Kunar, after apparently being hit by an RPG, killing 16 Americans. Also Thursday, Afghan and NATO forces battled suspected Taliban in Helmand's Sangin district. The Defense Ministry said "tens of enemies" were killed or wounded, but did not provide further detail. In western Farah province, insurgents attacked the Pusht Rod district late Wednesday, and ensuing clashes with police left 10 militants dead and 15 wounded, the Interior Ministry said. Retreating insurgents left behind one body and one wounded militant. Elsewhere, a senior military officer said the U.S. had "the Taliban on their heels" in Afghanistan. Brig. Gen. Perry Wiggins, deputy director of operations for the Joint Chiefs of Staff, told Pentagon reporters that "the Taliban has suffered numerous losses and has suffered losses to their senior leadership over this past month" in southern and eastern Afghanistan. As a result, the Taliban has "reverted to asymmetric-type, small-scale, high-profile attacks," he said. Mullah Dadullah, a one-legged veteran who orchestrated an intensifying campaign of suicide attacks and beheadings, was killed in an operation in southern Afghanistan this month. He had been considered the top Taliban field commander. Still, Wiggins said that as the poppy harvest ends, more insurgents might join the battle. "So the fight's not over," he said. "But we'll continue to take the offensive through several of the operations we have in Afghanistan, and hopefully ... continue to inflict casualties on the Taliban." Associated Press writers Lolita Baldor in Washington and Noor Khan in Kandahar, Afghanistan, contributed to this report.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/U/UN_LEBANON_TRIBUNAL?SITE=MSJAD&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT PM EDT Hezbollah, Syria denounce U.N. tribunal American U-N ambassador Zalmay Khalilzad (ZAHL'-may kah-LEEL'-zahd) says the tribunal will prevent future political violence. Hezbollah, Syria denounce U.N. tribunal Lebanese soldier killed by militants 20 suspects charged in Lebanon fighting Lebanese woman wounded by leftover bomb Fight is real test for Lebanese army Lebanon (AP) -- The militant Hezbollah group and its ally Syria denounced the United Nations on Thursday for its decision to establish a tribunal to prosecute the killers of former Prime Minister Rafik Hariri. Meanwhile, officials in Beirut reopened the road where Hariri was killed by a suicide truck bomb in February 2005. Mayor Abdel-Monem al-Ariss said the spot would remain "a historic symbol in the heart of Beirut." The tribunal has been at the core of a political crisis between the pro-Western government in Beirut and the Hezbollah-led opposition that has erupted into street clashes in recent months, killing 11 people. Hezbollah called the U.N. Security Council decision a violation of Lebanon's sovereignty and "an attack on its internal affairs." "It amounts to a flagrant violation that makes the resolution illegal and illegitimate at the national and international level," the Shiite Muslim group said in a statement, adding that the resolution placed Lebanon under "international tutelage, without decision-making and sovereignty in an unprecedented development in the history of sovereign states." U.S.-backed Prime Minister Fuad Saniora had asked the Security Council earlier this month to establish the tribunal, citing the refusal of opposition-aligned Parliament Speaker Nabih Berri to convene a session to ratify the creation of the tribunal. Berri rejected these accusations Thursday, reflecting the opposition's bitterness over the government's move to take the issue to the U.N. Lebanon's pro-Syrian president, Emile Lahoud, expressed skepticism over the tribunal's ability to "lead us to the truth" and identify the assassins. But he said he would support the court if it was "fair and impartial." Syria, which has been implicated in Hariri's assassination by the U.N., was also quick to criticize the establishment of the tribunal under Chapter 7 of the U.N. Charter, which deals with threats to international peace and allows military enforcement. Shortly after the vote late Wednesday, Syria's official news agency, citing an unidentified official, said: "The formation of the international court under Chapter 7 is considered as a degradation of Lebanon's sovereignty." Syrian newspapers on Thursday also criticized the decision as an American-Israeli effort to exact revenge on Damascus, an opponent of both. Syrian President Bashar Assad has denied involvement in the assassination and threatened not to cooperate with the tribunal if it infringes on Syrian national sovereignty. Police cleared roadblocks in front of the 328-yard stretch of road where Hariri and 22 others were killed. The seaside boulevard had been closed for more than two years while the U.N. scoured the ground, adjacent buildings and the nearby Mediterranean Sea for evidence. Among the first to drive through was a passenger minivan, whose driver stopped, got out of the vehicle, knelt and kissed the ground, saying: "God have mercy on your soul." Earlier, Carole Farhat, who survived the bombing two years ago, watched as laborers filled the bomb crater with gravel and paved over it. She said she was glad to be alive "to enjoy this moment." "I've come to see the spot where I was seconds away from death. It might be a good sign for Lebanon and for us," said Farhat, who was thrown in the air by the bombing as she crossed the road. She lost much of her hearing and sustained injuries to her eyes. Daniel Germani, an engineer who was also injured in the bombing, said the reopening of the road would allow his team to repair the famous St. George Hotel, which was severely damaged in the blast. Five hotel employees were killed and eight were wounded, he said. He estimated damages to the hotel at $10 million, saying they had yet to receive compensation. The U.N. resolution gives the Lebanese parliament a last chance to establish the tribunal itself. If it doesn't act by June 10, the U.N. decision will automatically "enter into force." Saad Hariri, leader of the parliamentary majority and the son of the late prime minister, and Saniora have extended a hand to the opposition after the tribunal's approval. But ratification by the parliament so far appears unlikely entangled. Saad Hariri said after the vote late Wednesday the decision was a turning point in Lebanon that would protect the country from further assassinations. The vote is a "victory the world has given to oppressed Lebanon and a victory for an oppressed Lebanon in the world," he said, holding back tears at the end of his televised speech. Saniora, a longtime confidant of Rafik Hariri, also called the tribunal "a triumph for Lebanon against injustice, crime and tyranny." He urged the Lebanese to put their differences behind, saying the approval of the tribunal was a "positive step" for renewed dialogue.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/R/RUSSIA_POISONED_SPY?SITE=MSJAD&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AM EDT Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death Lugovoi: British Involved in Spy's Death A-P correspondent Vladimir Isachenkov (ee-sah-CEHN'-kahf) reports Andrei Lugovoi spoke at length about what he claims were Alexander Litvinenko's contacts with British intelligence. Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race Russian diplomat: New arms race starting U.S. senators back missile defense plan Russia says new ICBM can beat any system Putin blasts U.S. missile defense plan Latest Photos from Russia into Poisoning Death of Former Spy Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death Britain seeks suspect in poisoning death Kremlin foe: Russian suspect in danger Litvinenko docu to premiere at Cannes 1998 tape shows Russian ex-spy fearful MOSCOW (AP) -- The Russian businessman whom Britain has named as a suspect in the killing of ex-KGB agent Alexander Litvinenko claimed Thursday that he has evidence of British special services' involvement in the poisoning death. Andrei Lugovoi, himself a former KGB agent, said Litvinenko tried to recruit him to gather compromising materials about Russian President Vladimir Putin for MI6, Britain's foreign intelligence agency. He claimed that British security services were unhappy with Litvinenko for boasting of his contacts with senior MI6 officials and spilling secrets. "It's hard to get rid of the thought that Litvinenko was an agent who got out of the secret service's control and was eliminated," Lugovoi told a news conference. "Even if it was not done by the secret service itself, it was done under its control or connivance." A British government security official, who demanded anonymity because of the sensitivity of the case, said the allegations were untrue. Britain's Foreign Office, responsible for MI6, declined to comment. Lugovoi claimed he had evidence of his allegations but that he would only give details to Russian investigators. Britain last week said it had enough evidence to charge Lugovoi, who also worked for the KGB and its main successor agency the FSB, in the November killing of Litvinenko. Litvinenko, who died of poisoning by the rare radioactive isotope polonium-210, had fled to Britain several years earlier after becoming a strong critic of the Kremlin and received British citizenship. Lugovoi and another Russian had met in London with Litvinenko on Nov. 1, the day Litvinenko said he became ill. Britain has requested Lugovoi's extradition, but Russia has refused, saying its constitution does not permit it. Lugovoi dismissed the British accusations against him as an attempt to divert attention from Litvinenko's contacts with British spy services. He claimed Litvinenko tried to recruit him during one of several business trips to Britain last year. At one point, he said, Litvinenko gave him a book for coding communications and a cell phone for contact with his British spy handlers. He said he refused to betray his country. "In conversations with me, Litvinenko often went beyond his role as a recruitment agent and told me many things he shouldn't have said," Lugovoi said. "I got an impression that he was really getting out of British secret services' control. He believed that the British undervalued him and paid him too little for his service." Oleg Gordievsky, a former top KGB spy who worked for MI6 and defected to Britain, dismissed Lugovoi's claims as "silly fantasies." He said Litvinenko had worked for domestic branches of the KGB and post-Soviet security structures and was of no interest to British intelligence. "MI6 not interested in information about the domestic service," Gordievsky, who was a friend of Litvinenko, said on British Broadcasting Corp. television. "Litvinenko was not needed. He made signals that he might be prepared, but they said, 'We don't need you,' so he didn't work for MI6." Lugovoi's statements would be "thoroughly investigated" by the Russian Prosecutor- General's office as part of its own inquiry into Litvinenko's killing, spokeswoman Anna Pozdnyakova said. She said prosecutors were already checking several similar claims he made previously under questioning. Konstantin Kosachev, the Kremlin-connected head of the foreign affairs committee in the lower house of the Russian parliament, urged British authorities to help investigate the "very serious accusations against British secret services." "I do believe they will take these new versions as seriously as it should be done," Kosachev said on Russia Today television. Lugovoi also claimed that Boris Berezovsky, a Russian billionaire living in self-exile in London who is among Putin's most powerful political foes, might have been involved in Litvinenko's death. Lugovoi said Litvinenko was angry after Berezovsky, his longtime friend and patron, cut a living allowance he paid Litvinenko. Lugovoi claimed that Litvinenko told him he could prove that the tycoon received political asylum in Britain under false pretenses. Russia has long sought Berezovsky's extradition to face charges of financial crimes that date back to the 1990s. Berezovsky says the charges are politically motivated. Lugovoi claimed that Berezovsky, who briefly served as a deputy secretary of Russia's presidential Security Council during the 1990s, also was an MI6 agent and gave British intelligence sensitive information about Russia. Berezovsky called Lugovoi's allegations "absolutely false." "MI6 absolutely knows who are agents for its organization, it knows Berezovsky is not on that list," Berezovsky told is not the story of Lugovoi, this is the story the Kremlin wants to present to the world. The Kremlin in a corner. Putin is in a corner." Associated Press writers D'Arcy Doran and David Stringer contributed to this report from London.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/S/SOUTH_AFRICA_BLAIR?SITE=MSJAD&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AM EDT Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa British Prime Minister Tony Blair says peaceful coexistence between religions can help prevent terrorism. Historian claims to ID Jack the Ripper Sudan: Sanctions are `death sentence' Sudan: U.S. sanctions over Darfur unfair Gunmen in Darfur kill U.N. peacekeeper U.N. peacekeeper killed in Darfur Editor, columnist detained in Sudan South Africa (AP) -- Nelson Mandela hailed Tony Blair on Thursday as "very good friend" to Africa for the priority he has given the continent, while the outgoing British prime minister called on rich countries to fulfill aid pledges to the region. Blair, ending his farewell tour of Africa, said the Group of Eight summit in Germany next week must follow through on commitments made two years ago, when Britain made Africa the focus of its presidency of the G-8. "We need each G-8 to be bolder than the last," Blair said in a speech at the University of South Africa. "If we give up, we will lose the chance in this continent, rich as it is though its people are often poor, for our values to take root. It would be a calamitous misjudgment and we should not make it." Blair said Mandela, who led the struggle against apartheid and became South Africa's first black president, embodied the best of the continent. The two men met at Mandela's foundation in Johannesburg. Blair "has been a very good friend to Africa, and I know his commitment will continue in his retirement," Mandela said. "I know that your energy, passion and youth can still play a big role in international affairs." Blair said both the West and Africa faced two possible paths. "One is chosen by countries like South Africa, Ghana, Tanzania, Mozambique, Botswana and many others, reinforcing economic growth with good governance and the stamping out of violence and corruption," he said. "The other, the path of Zimbabwe or Sudan, where bad government and violent oppression send the country's economy spiraling down." "Our choice is to support the good. Africa's challenge is to eliminate the bad," he said. Blair said debt-relief programs have helped countries like Zambia provide free basic health care, while funding from Britain and the West have helped improve education and distribute anti-AIDS drugs to hundreds of thousands. Blair has won praise from some African leaders, while others say Britain and other Western countries have not fulfilled lofty promises and high-sounding declarations. In his speech, Blair called for tougher action against Sudan over the violence in Darfur. Britain has said it would support Washington's proposal for a U.N. sanctions resolution against the Sudanese government. Despite months of international pressure, Sudanese President Omar al-Bashir has resisted the deployment of a 22,000-member joint U.N.-African Union force to quell a four-year conflict that has left more than 200,000 people dead. "It is wrong that President Bashir, intent on bombing his way to a solution, is determined to obstruct any effort made to reinforce the Africa Union's ability to improve security and stability," he said. "We must offer President Bashir a choice. Engage with us on a solution. Or, if you reject responsibility for the people of Darfur, then we will ... put to a vote sanctions against the regime," he said. Blair also appealed for renewed pressure on Zimbabwean President Robert Mugabe, accused by the West of becoming increasingly repressive and leading his country to economic ruin. The prime minister was due to meet later Friday with South African President Thabo Mbeki for talks likely to include the crisis in neighboring Zimbabwe. Mbeki, who is southern Africa's mediator on Zimbabwe, has kept to his long-standing policy of quiet diplomacy, but that has yet to persuade Mugabe to embrace political and economic reform.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/G/GUANTANAMO_SUICIDE?SITE=MSJAD&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AM EDT U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Gitmo Detainee Apparently Kills Himself A-P correspondent Mike Gracia reports Wednesday's apparent suicide at Guantanamo Bay is raising new criticism of the prison. From Suburbia to Guantanamo: The Odyssey of Majid Khan Assault with Bodily Fluids Failure to Follow Rules Hicks' stipulation of fact Pentagon acknowledges Geneva Convention protections D.O.D. list of Gitmo detainees Detainee Usama Hassan Ahmend Abu Kabir: I like my watch because it is durable Detainee Abdul Matin: Younger men and women use this watch everywhere Unnamed detainee: It's a watch. I use it like a watch Feroz Ali Abbasi's handwritten note released by the Pentagon Summarized sworn detainee statement released by the Pentagon U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Detainee appeals for reporter's release Gitmo detainee fears returning to Jordan US Commander: Guantanamo more controlled Guantanamo detainee threatens suicide Criminal complaint against Eljvir Duka in Fort Dix plot case Hearing Transcript: Waleed Mohammed bin Attash Hearing Transcript: Khalid Sheikh Mohammed Hearing Transcript Abu Faraj al-Libi Hearing Transcript: Ramzi Binalshibh Declassified Report: Iraq 'Cause Celebre' for Extremists 9 terror suspects plead not guilty Court upholds $2.8M Iran terrorism claim Al-Qaida video threatens attacks on U.S. Turkish police seize terror suspects Al-Qaida escapee in online video JUAN, Puerto Rico (AP) -- A Saudi Arabian detainee who apparently committed suicide at Guantanamo Bay had been held at the prison camp reserved for the least compliant and most "high-value" inmates, a U.S. military spokesman said Thursday. The Saudi government identified the man who died Wednesday as Abdul Rahman Maadha al-Amry. A spokesman for the kingdom's Interior Ministry, Maj. Gen. Mansour al-Turki, said it was too early to judge how al-Amry died. The U.S. military has not confirmed the detainee's identity or explained how it arrived at the conclusion that he probably committed suicide. "The actual cause of death is under investigation," Southern Command spokesman Jose Ruiz said by telephone from Miami on Thursday. Ruiz said the man was held at the maximum-security Camp 5. Guards at the U.S. Naval Base in southeast Cuba found the detainee unresponsive and not breathing in his cell Wednesday afternoon, the Southern Command announced Wednesday. It would be the fourth suicide at Guantanamo since the prison camp opened in January 2002. On June 10, 2006, two Saudi detainees and one Yemeni hanged themselves with sheets. Prisoners in Camp 5, which is similar to the highest-security U.S. prisons, are kept in individual, solid-wall cells and allowed outside for only two hours a day of recreation in an enclosed area. Wells Dixon, a defense attorney who met with detainees at Camp 5 last month, said many showed signs of desperation. "I can assure you that it is hell on earth," Dixon said. "You can see the despair on the faces of detainees. It's transparent." Other critics said detainees are frustrated at being held indefinitely without charges. "You have five and a half years of desperation there with no legal way out," said Michael Ratner, president of the New York-based Center for Constitutional Rights, which represents hundreds of Guantanamo detainees. "Sadly, it leads to people being so desperate they take their own lives." Lawyer Julia Tarver Mason, whose firm represents eight Saudi detainees at Guantanamo, said the government so far has declined to tell her if the man who died was among her clients. There are about 80 detainees from Saudi Arabia held at Guantanamo. "They are in the care of the United States government and that should mean that deaths should not occur," Mason said. The death came as Guantanamo prepares to hold pretrial hearings for two detainees in military tribunals. One of the detainees, Canadian Omar Khadr, fired his American attorneys on Wednesday, leaving him without defense counsel, his former U.S. military attorney told is still to be arraigned Monday. He and Salim Ahmed Hamdan, a Yemeni who also faces a hearing Monday, are among only three of the roughly 380 Guantanamo prisoners to be charged with a crime. The third, David Hicks, was convicted of aiding al-Qaida and returned to his native Australia. Khadr was 15 when he was captured in Afghanistan during a firefight in which he allegedly killed a U.S. Army special forces soldier with a grenade. "He doesn't trust American lawyers, and I don't particularly blame him," said U.S. Marine Lt. Col. Colby Vokey, who was taken off the case Wednesday. "The United States is responsible for his interrogation and his treatment under a process that is patently unfair." Many of the "enemy combatants" at the isolated prison camp have been held for more than five years. In most cases, the military accuses them of having links to al-Qaida or the Taliban. The former commander of the detention facilities, Navy Rear Adm. Harry Harris, described earlier suicides as acts of "asymmetric warfare" - an effort to increase condemnation of the prison. A cultural adviser was helping the military handle the remains. "The remains of the deceased detainee are being treated with the utmost respect," the military said. Associated Press writers Andrew O. Selsky and Ben Fox contributed to this story.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/V/VENEZUELA_CHAVEZ_VS_TV?SITE=MSJAD&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AM EDT Venezuela uproar concerns Carter Center Delayed: Latin America's Dirty Wars Leaning Left: Political Changes in Latin America Venezuela uproar concerns Carter Center U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Tropical Storm Barbara forms off Mexico Novelist Garcia Marquez goes home Bolivian police find big cocaine factory CARACAS, Venezuela (AP) -- The Carter Center called for dialogue Thursday between President Hugo Chavez and opponents protesting his decision to force an opposition TV channel off the air, while calm returned to the streets after three days of demonstrations. The Atlanta-based organization founded by former President Jimmy Carter expressed concern about the potential for escalating violence after the government halted broadcasts by Radio Caracas Television on Sunday. Police have repeatedly clashed with angry crowds hurling rocks and bottles since Chavez refused to renew the station's broadcast license. "Healthy democracies require spaces for political dialogue and debate to allow divisions about the future direction of the country to be addressed in peaceful ways," the Carter Center said. In parts of Caracas, meanwhile, Venezuelans walked to work along sidewalks littered with rocks and debris from the protests. Opposition leader Manuel Rosales on Wednesday demanded the release of dozens of students jailed during clashes between protesters and police. Rosales - the governor of western Zulia state who was defeated by Chavez in December elections - said protesters are demanding not only free speech but also the right to protest "peacefully and democratically." He noted that a home video broadcast on the Globovision network showed unidentified men in the doorway of a government office, apparently Chavez allies, firing guns at unseen targets. "For that there is no justice?" he asked. As he spoke, about 8,000 student protesters chanting "freedom!" marched through Caracas. Although the march was generally peaceful, there were several scuffles between students and Chavez supporters. The Carter Center, which has observed past elections here, said it is concerned that "non-renewal of broadcast concessions for political reasons will have a chilling effect on free speech." "A plurality of opinions should be protected," it said. "The right of dissent must be fiercely defended by every democratic government." Chavez accused RCTV of helping incite a failed coup in 2002 and violating various broadcast laws. He said his decision to replace it with a new state-funded public channel, TVES, was a step toward "democratizing" the airwaves.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/R/RICE?SITE=MSJAD&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AM EDT Rice holds line on Iran nuclear program Austria (AP) -- Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice held the hard U.S. line against concessions to Iran over its nuclear program Thursday and renewed a conditional offer to talk to the clerical regime on any subject. Iran also refused to budge ahead of talks Thursday between Iran's chief international negotiator and the European Union's senior foreign policy official. Asked if it is time to change tactics in the world's nuclear standoff with Iran, Rice ruled out the idea of dropping a key precondition. "I think it's time for Iran to change its tactics," Rice said. There is increasing sentiment in Europe that world powers trying to engage Iran should drop the demand that Iran halt, or suspend in diplomatic parlance, disputed nuclear activities before bargaining on a package of incentives could begin. "The international community is united on what Iran should do, which is to suspend; to demonstrate that it is in fact not seeking a nuclear weapon under cover of civilian nuclear power," Rice said. She spoke during a press conference with Austria's foreign minister, a year to the day after she made a dramatic outreach to longtime adversary Iran. The offer to talk "anytime, any place," was intended to inject new life into an ebbing European diplomatic effort to turn back Iran's advancing nuclear program. "I think the question isn't why won't we talk to Tehran. The question is why doesn't Tehran want to talk to us." Iran did not accept Rice's offer for the first Cabinet-level direct talks in nearly three decades because of the condition to stop enriching uranium. Enriched uranium is an ingredient for both the peaceful nuclear power Iran claims it wants or for the illicit weapons program that Washington suspects. "I repeat again that if Iran is prepared to take that course then we are prepared to change 27 years of American policy and sit with Iran to talk about whatever Iran would like to talk about," Rice said. "But that can't be done when Iran continues to ... try to perfect technologies that are going to lead to a nuclear weapon." Since Rice's offer, the Bush administration has embarked on a more cautious outreach to Iran. U.S. and Iranian diplomats have met twice to discuss the spiral of violence in Iraq. The United States accuses Iran of arming insurgents in next-door Iran, but Iran denies it. The disputed nuclear issue hangs over those limited talks. Tehran recently suggested a readiness to discuss a partial suspension of uranium enrichment, but the U.S. and key allies rejected the overture and Iran pulled back from the idea for starting talks on its nuclear program, diplomats said Wednesday With both sides back at their hard-line stances, an exploratory meeting Thursday between Iran's chief international negotiator and the European Union's senior foreign policy official was unlikely to make substantial headway, the diplomats told another sign of defiance, Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad boasted that his country's military has become so strong that no adversary would risk an attack. "We have passed our point of vulnerability," he told Iranian state television. Later Thursday, Rice skipped on opportunity to continue a public argument with Russia over U.S. plans to base a missile interceptor system in Europe. Speaking at the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe, Rice did not mention Russia or the controversy that has dominated increasingly troubled U.S.-Russian relations in recent months. Rice referred to the Cold War roots of the organization, begun as a bulwark against the Soviet Union, and said its expansion to include all manner of nations proves her theory that some historical events that seem impossible one day become inevitable. "That is for me, a great benefit and a great inspiration in a world that is in a great deal of turmoil now," Rice said.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/S/SOUTH_AFRICA_BLAIR?SITE=ORROS&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Police & Fire Logs Click & Vote Poll I Want to Know Homing in on Housing Douglas County & Manage Account News Racks and Dealers LATEST NEWS from AP Wire May 31, 11:35 AM EDT Blair: G-8 Must Keep Pledges to Africa British Prime Minister Tony Blair says peaceful coexistence between religions can help prevent terrorism. Historian Claims to ID Jack the Ripper Sudan: Sanctions Are `death Sentence' Sudan: U.S. Sanctions Over Darfur Unfair Gunmen in Darfur Kill U.N. Peacekeeper U.N. Peacekeeper Killed in Darfur Editor, Columnist Detained in Sudan South Africa (AP) -- Nelson Mandela hailed Tony Blair on Thursday as "very good friend" to Africa for the priority he has given the continent, while the outgoing British prime minister called on rich countries to fulfill aid pledges to the region. Blair, ending his farewell tour of Africa, said the Group of Eight summit in Germany next week must follow through on commitments made two years ago, when Britain made Africa the focus of its presidency of the G-8. "We need each G-8 to be bolder than the last," Blair said in a speech at the University of South Africa. "If we give up, we will lose the chance in this continent, rich as it is though its people are often poor, for our values to take root. It would be a calamitous misjudgment and we should not make it." Blair said Mandela, who led the struggle against apartheid and became South Africa's first black president, embodied the best of the continent. The two men met at Mandela's foundation in Johannesburg. Blair "has been a very good friend to Africa, and I know his commitment will continue in his retirement," Mandela said. "I know that your energy, passion and youth can still play a big role in international affairs." Blair said both the West and Africa faced two possible paths. "One is chosen by countries like South Africa, Ghana, Tanzania, Mozambique, Botswana and many others, reinforcing economic growth with good governance and the stamping out of violence and corruption," he said. "The other, the path of Zimbabwe or Sudan, where bad government and violent oppression send the country's economy spiraling down." "Our choice is to support the good. Africa's challenge is to eliminate the bad," he said. Blair said debt-relief programs have helped countries like Zambia provide free basic health care, while funding from Britain and the West have helped improve education and distribute anti-AIDS drugs to hundreds of thousands. Blair has won praise from some African leaders, while others say Britain and other Western countries have not fulfilled lofty promises and high-sounding declarations. In his speech, Blair called for tougher action against Sudan over the violence in Darfur. Britain has said it would support Washington's proposal for a U.N. sanctions resolution against the Sudanese government. Despite months of international pressure, Sudanese President Omar al-Bashir has resisted the deployment of a 22,000-member joint U.N.-African Union force to quell a four-year conflict that has left more than 200,000 people dead. "It is wrong that President Bashir, intent on bombing his way to a solution, is determined to obstruct any effort made to reinforce the Africa Union's ability to improve security and stability," he said. "We must offer President Bashir a choice. Engage with us on a solution. Or, if you reject responsibility for the people of Darfur, then we will ... put to a vote sanctions against the regime," he said. Blair also appealed for renewed pressure on Zimbabwean President Robert Mugabe, accused by the West of becoming increasingly repressive and leading his country to economic ruin. The prime minister was due to meet later Friday with South African President Thabo Mbeki for talks likely to include the crisis in neighboring Zimbabwe. Mbeki, who is southern Africa's mediator on Zimbabwe, has kept to his long-standing policy of quiet diplomacy, but that has yet to persuade Mugabe to embrace political and economic reform. &copy; 2007 and portal sites All contents &copy; Copyright 2006 newsreview.info N.E. Winchester - PO Box 1248 - Roseburg, OR 97470
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/R/RUSSIA_POISONED_SPY?SITE=ORROS&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Police & Fire Logs Click & Vote Poll I Want to Know Homing in on Housing Douglas County & Manage Account News Racks and Dealers LATEST NEWS from AP Wire May 31, 11:14 AM EDT Suspect: U.K. Involved in Ex-Spy's Death Lugovoi: British Involved in Spy's Death A-P correspondent Vladimir Isachenkov (ee-sah-CEHN'-kahf) reports Andrei Lugovoi spoke at length about what he claims were Alexander Litvinenko's contacts with British intelligence. Suspect: U.K. Involved in Ex-Spy's Death Putin: U.S. Has Triggered New Arms Race Russian Diplomat: New Arms Race Starting U.S. Senators Back Missile Defense Plan Russia Says New ICBM Can Beat Any System Putin Blasts U.S. Missile Defense Plan Latest Photos from Russia into Poisoning Death of Former Spy Suspect: U.K. Involved in Ex-Spy's Death Britain Seeks Suspect in Poisoning Death Kremlin Foe: Russian Suspect in Danger Litvinenko Docu to Premiere at Cannes 1998 Tape Shows Russian Ex-Spy Fearful MOSCOW (AP) -- The Russian businessman whom Britain has named as a suspect in the killing of ex-KGB agent Alexander Litvinenko claimed Thursday that he has evidence of British special services' involvement in the poisoning death. Andrei Lugovoi, himself a former KGB agent, said Litvinenko tried to recruit him to gather compromising materials about Russian President Vladimir Putin for MI6, Britain's foreign intelligence agency. He claimed that British security services were unhappy with Litvinenko for boasting of his contacts with senior MI6 officials and spilling secrets. "It's hard to get rid of the thought that Litvinenko was an agent who got out of the secret service's control and was eliminated," Lugovoi told a news conference. "Even if it was not done by the secret service itself, it was done under its control or connivance." A British government security official, who demanded anonymity because of the sensitivity of the case, said the allegations were untrue. Britain's Foreign Office, responsible for MI6, declined to comment. Lugovoi claimed he had evidence of his allegations but that he would only give details to Russian investigators. Britain last week said it had enough evidence to charge Lugovoi, who also worked for the KGB and its main successor agency the FSB, in the November killing of Litvinenko. Litvinenko, who died of poisoning by the rare radioactive isotope polonium-210, had fled to Britain several years earlier after becoming a strong critic of the Kremlin and received British citizenship. Lugovoi and another Russian had met in London with Litvinenko on Nov. 1, the day Litvinenko said he became ill. Britain has requested Lugovoi's extradition, but Russia has refused, saying its constitution does not permit it. Lugovoi dismissed the British accusations against him as an attempt to divert attention from Litvinenko's contacts with British spy services. He claimed Litvinenko tried to recruit him during one of several business trips to Britain last year. At one point, he said, Litvinenko gave him a book for coding communications and a cell phone for contact with his British spy handlers. He said he refused to betray his country. "In conversations with me, Litvinenko often went beyond his role as a recruitment agent and told me many things he shouldn't have said," Lugovoi said. "I got an impression that he was really getting out of British secret services' control. He believed that the British undervalued him and paid him too little for his service." Oleg Gordievsky, a former top KGB spy who worked for MI6 and defected to Britain, dismissed Lugovoi's claims as "silly fantasies." He said Litvinenko had worked for domestic branches of the KGB and post-Soviet security structures and was of no interest to British intelligence. "MI6 not interested in information about the domestic service," Gordievsky, who was a friend of Litvinenko, said on British Broadcasting Corp. television. "Litvinenko was not needed. He made signals that he might be prepared, but they said, 'We don't need you,' so he didn't work for MI6." Lugovoi's statements would be "thoroughly investigated" by the Russian Prosecutor- General's office as part of its own inquiry into Litvinenko's killing, spokeswoman Anna Pozdnyakova said. She said prosecutors were already checking several similar claims he made previously under questioning. Konstantin Kosachev, the Kremlin-connected head of the foreign affairs committee in the lower house of the Russian parliament, urged British authorities to help investigate the "very serious accusations against British secret services." "I do believe they will take these new versions as seriously as it should be done," Kosachev said on Russia Today television. Lugovoi also claimed that Boris Berezovsky, a Russian billionaire living in self-exile in London who is among Putin's most powerful political foes, might have been involved in Litvinenko's death. Lugovoi said Litvinenko was angry after Berezovsky, his longtime friend and patron, cut a living allowance he paid Litvinenko. Lugovoi claimed that Litvinenko told him he could prove that the tycoon received political asylum in Britain under false pretenses. Russia has long sought Berezovsky's extradition to face charges of financial crimes that date back to the 1990s. Berezovsky says the charges are politically motivated. Lugovoi claimed that Berezovsky, who briefly served as a deputy secretary of Russia's presidential Security Council during the 1990s, also was an MI6 agent and gave British intelligence sensitive information about Russia. Berezovsky called Lugovoi's allegations "absolutely false." "MI6 absolutely knows who are agents for its organization, it knows Berezovsky is not on that list," Berezovsky told is not the story of Lugovoi, this is the story the Kremlin wants to present to the world. The Kremlin in a corner. Putin is in a corner." Associated Press writers D'Arcy Doran and David Stringer contributed to this report from London. &copy; 2007 and portal sites All contents &copy; Copyright 2006 newsreview.info N.E. Winchester - PO Box 1248 - Roseburg, OR 97470
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/V/VENEZUELA_CHAVEZ_VS_TV?SITE=ORROS&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Police & Fire Logs Click & Vote Poll I Want to Know Homing in on Housing Douglas County & Manage Account News Racks and Dealers LATEST NEWS from AP Wire May 31, 11:14 AM EDT Venezuela Uproar Concerns Carter Center Delayed: Latin America's Dirty Wars Leaning Left: Political Changes in Latin America Tropical Storm Barbara Weakens in Mexico Venezuela Uproar Concerns Carter Center U.S.: Dead Detainee Was of High Value Novelist Garcia Marquez Goes Home Bolivian Police Find Big Cocaine Factory CARACAS, Venezuela (AP) -- The Carter Center called for dialogue Thursday between President Hugo Chavez and opponents protesting his decision to force an opposition TV channel off the air, while calm returned to the streets after three days of demonstrations. The Atlanta-based organization founded by former President Jimmy Carter expressed concern about the potential for escalating violence after the government halted broadcasts by Radio Caracas Television on Sunday. Police have repeatedly clashed with angry crowds hurling rocks and bottles since Chavez refused to renew the station's broadcast license. "Healthy democracies require spaces for political dialogue and debate to allow divisions about the future direction of the country to be addressed in peaceful ways," the Carter Center said. In parts of Caracas, meanwhile, Venezuelans walked to work along sidewalks littered with rocks and debris from the protests. Opposition leader Manuel Rosales on Wednesday demanded the release of dozens of students jailed during clashes between protesters and police. Rosales - the governor of western Zulia state who was defeated by Chavez in December elections - said protesters are demanding not only free speech but also the right to protest "peacefully and democratically." He noted that a home video broadcast on the Globovision network showed unidentified men in the doorway of a government office, apparently Chavez allies, firing guns at unseen targets. "For that there is no justice?" he asked. As he spoke, about 8,000 student protesters chanting "freedom!" marched through Caracas. Although the march was generally peaceful, there were several scuffles between students and Chavez supporters. The Carter Center, which has observed past elections here, said it is concerned that "non-renewal of broadcast concessions for political reasons will have a chilling effect on free speech." "A plurality of opinions should be protected," it said. "The right of dissent must be fiercely defended by every democratic government." Chavez accused RCTV of helping incite a failed coup in 2002 and violating various broadcast laws. He said his decision to replace it with a new state-funded public channel, TVES, was a step toward "democratizing" the airwaves. &copy; 2007 and portal sites All contents &copy; Copyright 2006 newsreview.info N.E. Winchester - PO Box 1248 - Roseburg, OR 97470
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/I/ISRAEL_PALESTINIANS?SITE=ORROS&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Police & Fire Logs Click & Vote Poll I Want to Know Homing in on Housing Douglas County & Manage Account News Racks and Dealers LATEST NEWS from AP Wire May 31, 9:03 AM EDT Abbas, Olmert to Try to Mend Cease-Fire Israel Steps Up Attacks on Hamas Abbas, Olmert to Try to Mend Cease-Fire Olmert Weighing Peace Talks With Syria Israel Bars Burials in Old City Cemetery Group: Gaza Students Need Freer Travel Peres to Run for Israeli Presidency Conflict in the Middle East CITY, Gaza Strip (AP) -- The Israeli and Palestinian leaders will meet next week in the Palestinian territories for the first time in a bid to restore a shattered cease-fire in the Gaza Strip, a senior Palestinian official said Thursday. The announcement came amid a slowdown in violence after two weeks of fighting between Palestinian rocket squads and Israeli forces. The fighting is expected to dominate the agenda of next week's meeting between Palestinian President Mahmoud Abbas and Israeli Prime Minister Ehud Olmert. "The president is working night and day for a mutual, comprehensive cease-fire," said Nabil Abu Rdeneh, a top aide to Abbas. Abu Rdeneh said next week's summit, scheduled for June 7, "is expected in the Palestinian territories." Officials would not say where, but in the past they have mentioned the West Bank oasis of Jericho as the likely venue. While the two leaders have held a series of meetings over the past year, the Palestinians haven't hosted any of the gatherings. Olmert's spokeswoman, Miri Eisin, said a West Bank meeting is "a possibility," but said the date and location still have not been finalized. Olmert and Abbas promised Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice in March to meet every two weeks with the aim of moving beyond day-to-day issues and begin discussing the outlines of a final peace agreement. However, the men have met just once since then, in April, and next week's talks will focus on the fighting. A five-month truce in Gaza unraveled earlier this month when the Hamas militant group began firing barrages of rockets into southern Israel, prompting Israel to respond with a series of airstrikes. More than 50 Palestinians, most of them militants, and two Israeli civilians have been killed. In the latest violence, Israeli aircraft attacked a Palestinian rocket-launching squad in northern Gaza. No injuries were reported. "We will actively pursue and hit these rocket launchers as well as those who operate them," said David Baker, an official in Olmert's office. Despite the flareup, there were signs of a slowdown in fighting. Hamas' military wing, which has been responsible for most of the recent rocket fire, said it has not launched a projectile in 48 hours. "Perhaps there is an unannounced cease-fire," Abu Rdeneh said. The smaller Islamic Jihad group claimed responsibility for Thursday's rocket fire. In a separate incident, Islamic Jihad said two members were slightly injured in an Israeli artillery strike. But the army denied involvement. Still, the number of rocket attacks has sharply dropped in recent days. Israel resolved on Wednesday to keep striking Gaza rocket squads and said it wasn't negotiating a truce with radical groups. Israeli officials believe the Israeli air campaign is the reason for the reduced rocket fire. Abbas, a moderate who favors peacemaking, has been pushing Hamas to restore the Gaza cease-fire. But he has been ineffective in halting militant attacks. Abbas' Fatah movement and Hamas are partners in the Palestinian coalition government. That partnership is extremely fragile, however, and Hamas began attacking Israel in an apparent attempt to halt a fresh wave of Palestinian infighting. Abbas has proposed a truce agreement that would commit Gaza militants to halt their rocket fire for a month to permit negotiations on a more comprehensive cease-fire including the West Bank. Militants have said a truce is out of the question as long as Israel keeps up its attacks and refuses to bring a truce to the West Bank, where it frequently conducts arrest raids. Israel has so far rejected the notion of applying the truce to West Bank, especially in light of the latest round of attacks from Gaza. Meanwhile, Hamas and Fatah are expected to meet next week to discuss shoring up an internal truce called after this month's infighting, which killed more than 50 Palestinians, said a senior Egyptian security official. Both sides have sent representatives to Cairo to individually speak to Egyptian mediators about the reasons for the latest outbreak in fighting, and the possibilities of coming to a truce with Israel. The two sides are expected to agree to form a committee that will include an impartial Egyptian observer to call judgment on violations of the truce currently holding between Palestinians, said Lt. Col. Burhan Hamad, head of the Gaza-based Egyptian security delegation. "But it's not a guarantee against fighting," Burhan warned. Although the internal truce has mostly held, mistrust runs deep. Both sides have welcomed Egyptian involvement. "We want to get out of mutual accusations through the refereeing of a third party, trusted by both sides, and that is the Egyptians," said Mohammed Dahlan, a Fatah strongman in Gaza, speaking on an Arab news television station. &copy; 2007 and portal sites All contents &copy; Copyright 2006 newsreview.info N.E. Winchester - PO Box 1248 - Roseburg, OR 97470
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/I/IRAQ?SITE=ORROS&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Police & Fire Logs Click & Vote Poll I Want to Know Homing in on Housing Douglas County & Manage Account News Racks and Dealers LATEST NEWS from AP Wire May 31, 12:21 PM EDT Iraq Residents Rise Up Against al-Qaida A-P correspondent Steve Hurst reports residents of the Baghdad neighborhood looked to U-S forces for help. Chaotic Scene in Baghdad on Memorial Day Searching With Missing Soldiers' Platoon A War Widow's Story The Toll: Coalition Casualties Since March 2003 How MySpace is Changing the Face of War Al-Sadr's Followers Becoming Less Unified end interactive icon section --> Latest photos from Iraq Bush Calls for Global Emissions Goals Iraq Residents Rise Up Against al-Qaida Cease-Fire Eyed to Stop Violence in Iraq Turkish General: Ready for PKK Strike Bush Sees South Korea Model for Iraq Executive Summary: DOD Inspector General on Pre-Iraq War Intelligence Activities(2/9/2007) Unclassified National Intelligence Estimate Summary on Iraq (2/2/2007) Inspector General Report on Iraq Reconstruction (1/31/2007) (AP) -- A battle raged in west Baghdad on Thursday after residents rose up against al-Qaida and called for U.S. military help to end random gunfire that forced people to huddle indoors and threats that kept students from final exams, a member of the district council said. Elsewhere, a suicide bomber hit a police recruiting center in Fallujah, killing as many as 25 people, police said. The U.S. military said only one policeman was killed and eight were wounded. The American military also reported the deaths of three more soldiers, two killed Wednesday in a roadside bombing in Baghdad and one who died of wounds from a roadside bomb attack northwest of the capital Tuesday. At least 122 American forces have died in May, the third-deadliest month of the Iraq conflict. U.S. forces backed by helicopter gunships clashed with suspected al-Qaida gunmen in western Baghdad's primarily Sunni Muslim Amariyah neighborhood in an engagement that lasted several hours, said the district councilman, who would not allow use of his name for fear of al-Qaida retribution. Casualty figures were not immediately available and there was not immediate word from the U.S. military on the engagement. But the councilman said the al-Qaida leader in the Amariyah district, known as Haji Hameed, was killed and 45 other fighters were detained. Members of al-Qaida, who consider the district part of their so-called Islamic State of Iraq, were preventing students from attending final exams, shooting randomly and forcing residents to stay in their homes, the councilman said. U.S. forces also continued a search for five Britons who were kidnapped Tuesday in Baghdad, as well as for two of its soldiers who have been missing since a May 12 ambush south of the capital. The Fallujah suicide bomber killed at least 10 policemen in the attack, which occurred about 11 a.m., according to a police official in the city who spoke on condition of anonymity because he was not authorized to release the information. The rest of the dead were civilians, many of them in line seeking jobs as policemen. He said as many as 50 were wounded. Fallujah General Hospital had received 15 bodies and 10 wounded, according to a doctor there, who would not allow the use of his name because he feared retribution. The physician said he believed other casualties were taken to the nearby Jordanian Hospital and private clinics. A member of the Fallujah city council, who also asked for anonymity for fear of attack by insurgents, said there were at least 20 killed and 25 injured. The coordination of information in Fallujah was particularly difficult because the mobile telephone system has been working only sporadically. Maj. Jeff Pool of the Multi-National Force-West said the Anbar province governor's office and the provincial police put the total number of dead at one Iraqi policeman, with six police and two civilians wounded in Fallujah, 40 miles west of Baghdad. Police said the bomber detonated explosives in his vest at the third of four checkpoints, standing among recruits who were lining up to apply for jobs on the force. The center had only opened Saturday in a primary school in eastern Fallujah. The U.S. military and Iraqi army and police were running the center along with members of Anbar Salvation Council, a loose grouping of Sunni tribes that have banded together to fight al-Qaida. Police stations and recruiting posts have been a favorite target of Sunni insurgents and al-Qaida throughout the war. U.S. forces, meanwhile, pressed on with the search for five kidnapped Britons, and a procession of mourners, some of them women wailing and beating their chests, marched through Sadr City behind a small bus carrying the coffins of two people who police said were killed in a U.S. helicopter strike before dawn. The U.S. military said it had no report of airstrikes in Sadr City and that there were no civilian casualties in the second day of a search for the Britons, who were abducted Tuesday from a Finance Ministry data processing building in eastern Baghdad. A U.S. military statement, however, said U.S. and Iraqi forces had arrested two "members of the secret cell terrorist network" in Sadr City. There was no mention of fatalities. AP Television News videotape from Sadr City showed the coffins of the victims atop a small bus with men and women walking behind, crying. A young boy could be seen sitting next to the coffins. A car in the area was punctured with big holes, as if hit by an airstrike. A police officer in Sadr City, who refused to allow use of his name because he feared retribution, said the helicopter hit a house and car at 4:30 a.m., killing two elderly people sleeping on the roof of their home - a common practice in Iraq's extreme heat through late spring and summer. The officer said a 13-year-old boy was wounded. Also in Sadr City raids, which the U.S. has been conducting with a select unit of Iraqi army forces, Shiite cleric Abdul-Zahra al-Suwaidi claimed his home was raided and ransacked by American forces at 3 a.m. Thursday. The military said it had no report of the incident. Al-Suwaidi, who runs the Sadr City political office of radical cleric Muqtada al-Sadr, said he was sleeping elsewhere at the time of the raid, expecting that he would be targeted. He said his home was badly damaged and a small amount of money was taken. Dozens of U.S. Humvees and Bradley fighting vehicles had taken up positions around Sadr City at nightfall Wednesday. The five kidnapped Britons included four bodyguards working for the Montreal-based security firm GardaWorld and one employee of BearingPoint, a U.S.-based management consulting firm. In Washington, Brig. Gen. Perry Wiggins, deputy director of operations for the Joint Chiefs of Staff, said the military believed a helicopter that crashed Monday north of Baghdad was brought down by small-arms fire. The Islamic State of Iraq, an al-Qaida front group, claimed responsibility. Wiggins also said that more than 100 patrols a day were being launched to search for two missing troops who vanished after a May 12 ambush near Mahmoudiya, south of Baghdad. Four Americans and one Iraqi soldier were killed in the attack and the body of another American was later found in the Euphrates River. "Our determination and resolve to locate our missing soldiers is unwavering," Wiggins said. &copy; 2007 and portal sites All contents &copy; Copyright 2006 newsreview.info N.E. Winchester - PO Box 1248 - Roseburg, OR 97470
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/M/MEXICO_TROPICAL_WEATHER?SITE=ORROS&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Police & Fire Logs Click & Vote Poll I Want to Know Homing in on Housing Douglas County & Manage Account News Racks and Dealers LATEST NEWS from AP Wire May 31, 12:42 PM EDT Tropical Storm Barbara Weakens in Mexico Hurricane specialist, Jack Bevin (BEH'-vin), says don't expect any definitive path from Tropical Storm Barbara for a while. Hurricane History: A Look at the Past 150 Years in the U.S. Search by ZIP code: Tropical Storm Barbara Weakens in Mexico Poll: Coast Not Ready for Hurricanes 9 Atlantic Hurricanes Forecast for 2007 Delayed: Latin America's Dirty Wars Leaning Left: Political Changes in Latin America Tropical Storm Barbara Weakens in Mexico Venezuela Uproar Concerns Carter Center U.S.: Dead Detainee Was of High Value Novelist Garcia Marquez Goes Home Bolivian Police Find Big Cocaine Factory MEXICO CITY (AP) -- Tropical Storm Barbara weakened off the southwestern Pacific coast of Mexico on Thursday and forecasters said the storm was unlikely to become a hurricane. Barbara's winds were clocked at 40 mph, down from 54 mph late Wednesday, and it was inching along about 155 miles south-southwest of the coastal town of Puerto Angel, Mexico's National Meteorological Service reported. The U.S. National Hurricane Center in Miami said the storm could still dump heavy rain and cause dangerous flooding along the Mexican and Guatemalan coasts by Saturday, but was unlikely to become a hurricane. The first tropical storm of the eastern Pacific's 2007 season, Alvin faded at sea Thursday. Only twice before has the hurricane center had two named May storms, in 1984 and 1956, and forecasters have predicted a busy hurricane season. Forecasters at the U.S. Hurricane Center predict as many as 16 major Pacific storms and nine hurricanes, four of them intense. The eastern Pacific hurricane season opened May 15. &copy; 2007 and portal sites All contents &copy; Copyright 2006 newsreview.info N.E. Winchester - PO Box 1248 - Roseburg, OR 97470
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/G/GUANTANAMO_SUICIDE?SITE=ORROS&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Police & Fire Logs Click & Vote Poll I Want to Know Homing in on Housing Douglas County & Manage Account News Racks and Dealers LATEST NEWS from AP Wire May 31, 10:37 AM EDT U.S.: Dead Detainee Was of High Value Gitmo Detainee Apparently Kills Himself A-P correspondent Mike Gracia reports Wednesday's apparent suicide at Guantanamo Bay is raising new criticism of the prison. From Suburbia to Guantanamo: The Odyssey of Majid Khan Assault with Bodily Fluids Failure to Follow Rules Hicks' stipulation of fact Pentagon acknowledges Geneva Convention protections D.O.D. list of Gitmo detainees Detainee Usama Hassan Ahmend Abu Kabir: I like my watch because it is durable Detainee Abdul Matin: Younger men and women use this watch everywhere Unnamed detainee: It's a watch. I use it like a watch Feroz Ali Abbasi's handwritten note released by the Pentagon Summarized sworn detainee statement released by the Pentagon U.S.: Dead Detainee Was of High Value Detainee Appeals for Reporter's Release Gitmo Detainee Fears Returning to Jordan US Commander: Guantanamo More Controlled Guantanamo Detainee Threatens Suicide Criminal complaint against Eljvir Duka in Fort Dix plot case Hearing Transcript: Waleed Mohammed bin Attash Hearing Transcript: Khalid Sheikh Mohammed Hearing Transcript Abu Faraj al-Libi Hearing Transcript: Ramzi Binalshibh Declassified Report: Iraq 'Cause Celebre' for Extremists 9 Terror Suspects Plead Not Guilty Court Upholds $2.8M Iran Terrorism Claim al-Qaida Video Threatens Attacks on U.S. Turkish Police Seize Terror Suspects al-Qaida Escapee in Online Video JUAN, Puerto Rico (AP) -- A Saudi Arabian detainee who apparently committed suicide at Guantanamo Bay had been held at the prison camp reserved for the least compliant and most "high-value" inmates, a U.S. military spokesman said Thursday. The Saudi government identified the man who died Wednesday as Abdul Rahman Maadha al-Amry. A spokesman for the kingdom's Interior Ministry, Maj. Gen. Mansour al-Turki, said it was too early to judge how al-Amry died. The U.S. military has not confirmed the detainee's identity or explained how it arrived at the conclusion that he probably committed suicide. "The actual cause of death is under investigation," Southern Command spokesman Jose Ruiz said by telephone from Miami on Thursday. Ruiz said the man was held at the maximum-security Camp 5. Guards at the U.S. Naval Base in southeast Cuba found the detainee unresponsive and not breathing in his cell Wednesday afternoon, the Southern Command announced Wednesday. It would be the fourth suicide at Guantanamo since the prison camp opened in January 2002. On June 10, 2006, two Saudi detainees and one Yemeni hanged themselves with sheets. Prisoners in Camp 5, which is similar to the highest-security U.S. prisons, are kept in individual, solid-wall cells and allowed outside for only two hours a day of recreation in an enclosed area. Wells Dixon, a defense attorney who met with detainees at Camp 5 last month, said many showed signs of desperation. "I can assure you that it is hell on earth," Dixon said. "You can see the despair on the faces of detainees. It's transparent." Other critics said detainees are frustrated at being held indefinitely without charges. "You have five and a half years of desperation there with no legal way out," said Michael Ratner, president of the New York-based Center for Constitutional Rights, which represents hundreds of Guantanamo detainees. "Sadly, it leads to people being so desperate they take their own lives." Lawyer Julia Tarver Mason, whose firm represents eight Saudi detainees at Guantanamo, said the government so far has declined to tell her if the man who died was among her clients. There are about 80 detainees from Saudi Arabia held at Guantanamo. "They are in the care of the United States government and that should mean that deaths should not occur," Mason said. The death came as Guantanamo prepares to hold pretrial hearings for two detainees in military tribunals. One of the detainees, Canadian Omar Khadr, fired his American attorneys on Wednesday, leaving him without defense counsel, his former U.S. military attorney told is still to be arraigned Monday. He and Salim Ahmed Hamdan, a Yemeni who also faces a hearing Monday, are among only three of the roughly 380 Guantanamo prisoners to be charged with a crime. The third, David Hicks, was convicted of aiding al-Qaida and returned to his native Australia. Khadr was 15 when he was captured in Afghanistan during a firefight in which he allegedly killed a U.S. Army special forces soldier with a grenade. "He doesn't trust American lawyers, and I don't particularly blame him," said U.S. Marine Lt. Col. Colby Vokey, who was taken off the case Wednesday. "The United States is responsible for his interrogation and his treatment under a process that is patently unfair." Many of the "enemy combatants" at the isolated prison camp have been held for more than five years. In most cases, the military accuses them of having links to al-Qaida or the Taliban. The former commander of the detention facilities, Navy Rear Adm. Harry Harris, described earlier suicides as acts of "asymmetric warfare" - an effort to increase condemnation of the prison. A cultural adviser was helping the military handle the remains. "The remains of the deceased detainee are being treated with the utmost respect," the military said. Associated Press writers Andrew O. Selsky and Ben Fox contributed to this story. &copy; 2007 and portal sites All contents &copy; Copyright 2006 newsreview.info N.E. Winchester - PO Box 1248 - Roseburg, OR 97470
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/R/RUSSIA_PUTIN?SITE=ORROS&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Police & Fire Logs Click & Vote Poll I Want to Know Homing in on Housing Douglas County & Manage Account News Racks and Dealers LATEST NEWS from AP Wire May 31, 10:56 AM EDT Putin: U.S. Has Triggered New Arms Race Suspect: U.K. Involved in Ex-Spy's Death Putin: U.S. Has Triggered New Arms Race Russian Diplomat: New Arms Race Starting U.S. Senators Back Missile Defense Plan Russia Says New ICBM Can Beat Any System Putin Blasts U.S. Missile Defense Plan Latest Photos from Russia (AP) -- President Vladimir Putin said Thursday that tests of new Russian missiles were a response to the planned deployment of U.S. missile defense installations and other forces in Europe, suggesting Washington has triggered a new arms race. In a clear reference to the United States, he harshly criticized "imperialism" in global affairs and warned that Russia will strengthen its military potential to maintain a global strategic balance. "It wasn't us who initiated a new round of arms race," Putin said when asked about Russia's missile tests at a news conference after talks in the Kremlin with Greek President Karolos Papoulias. Putin described Tuesday's tests of a new ballistic missile capable of carrying multiple nuclear warheads and a new cruise missile as part of the Russian response to the planned deployment of new U.S. military bases and missile defense sites in ex-Soviet satellites in Central and Eastern Europe. He assailed the United States and other NATO members for failing to ratify an amended version of the 1990 Conventional Forces in Europe (CFE) treaty, which limits the deployment of heavy non-nuclear weapons around the continent. "We have signed and ratified the CFE and are fully implementing it. We have pulled out all our heavy weapons from the European part of Russia to (locations) behind the Ural Mountains and cut our military by 300,000 men," Putin said. "And what about our partners? They are filling Eastern Europe with new weapons. A new base in Bulgaria, another one in Romania, a (missile defense) site in Poland and a radar in the Czech Republic," he said. "What we are supposed to do? We can't just sit back and look at that." Putin and other Russian officials have repeatedly rejected U.S. assurances that the planned missile defense installations are meant to counter a potential threat from nations such as Iran and pose no danger to Russia. Putin reaffirmed his warning that Russia would opt out of the CFE treaty altogether if NATO nations fail to ratify its amended version. "Either you ratify the treaty and start observing it, or we will opt out of it," Putin said. In remarks clearly directed against Washington, Putin blasted those "who want to dictate their will to all others regardless of international norms and law." "It's dangerous and harmful," he added. "Norms of the international law were replaced with political expediency. We view it as diktat and imperialism." Russia this week initiated an international conference to be held in Austria in early June to discuss the situation around the CFE treaty. Putin described the tests of new missiles conducted by Russia on Tuesday as a necessary response to the Western action. "There is no reason to fear these actions by Russia, they aren't aggressive. It's merely a response to tough and unfounded unilateral actions by our partners," he said. "These actions are aimed at preserving a global balance." In one missile test Tuesday, a prototype of new Russia's intercontinental ballistic missile, called the RS-24, was fired from a mobile launcher at the Plesetsk launch site in northwestern Russia and its test warhead landed on target 3,400 miles away on the Far Eastern Kamchatka Peninsula, officials said. Russia's military also tested a new cruise missile based on the existing short-range Iskander missile. "We will keep modernizing our potential," Putin said. &copy; 2007 and portal sites All contents &copy; Copyright 2006 newsreview.info N.E. Winchester - PO Box 1248 - Roseburg, OR 97470
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/U/UN_LEBANON_TRIBUNAL?SITE=ORROS&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Police & Fire Logs Click & Vote Poll I Want to Know Homing in on Housing Douglas County & Manage Account News Racks and Dealers LATEST NEWS from AP Wire May 31, 12:09 PM EDT Hezbollah, Syria Denounce U.N. Tribunal American U-N ambassador Zalmay Khalilzad (ZAHL'-may kah-LEEL'-zahd) says the tribunal will prevent future political violence. Hezbollah, Syria Denounce U.N. Tribunal Lebanese Soldier Killed by Militants 20 Suspects Charged in Lebanon Fighting Lebanese Woman Wounded by Leftover Bomb Fight Is Real Test for Lebanese Army Lebanon (AP) -- The militant Hezbollah group and its ally Syria denounced the United Nations on Thursday for its decision to establish a tribunal to prosecute the killers of former Prime Minister Rafik Hariri. Meanwhile, officials in Beirut reopened the road where Hariri was killed by a suicide truck bomb in February 2005. Mayor Abdel-Monem al-Ariss said the spot would remain "a historic symbol in the heart of Beirut." The tribunal has been at the core of a political crisis between the pro-Western government in Beirut and the Hezbollah-led opposition that has erupted into street clashes in recent months, killing 11 people. Hezbollah called the U.N. Security Council decision a violation of Lebanon's sovereignty and "an attack on its internal affairs." "It amounts to a flagrant violation that makes the resolution illegal and illegitimate at the national and international level," the Shiite Muslim group said in a statement, adding that the resolution placed Lebanon under "international tutelage, without decision-making and sovereignty in an unprecedented development in the history of sovereign states." U.S.-backed Prime Minister Fuad Saniora had asked the Security Council earlier this month to establish the tribunal, citing the refusal of opposition-aligned Parliament Speaker Nabih Berri to convene a session to ratify the creation of the tribunal. Berri rejected these accusations Thursday, reflecting the opposition's bitterness over the government's move to take the issue to the U.N. Lebanon's pro-Syrian president, Emile Lahoud, expressed skepticism over the tribunal's ability to "lead us to the truth" and identify the assassins. But he said he would support the court if it was "fair and impartial." Syria, which has been implicated in Hariri's assassination by the U.N., was also quick to criticize the establishment of the tribunal under Chapter 7 of the U.N. Charter, which deals with threats to international peace and allows military enforcement. Shortly after the vote late Wednesday, Syria's official news agency, citing an unidentified official, said: "The formation of the international court under Chapter 7 is considered as a degradation of Lebanon's sovereignty." Syrian newspapers on Thursday also criticized the decision as an American-Israeli effort to exact revenge on Damascus, an opponent of both. Syrian President Bashar Assad has denied involvement in the assassination and threatened not to cooperate with the tribunal if it infringes on Syrian national sovereignty. Police cleared roadblocks in front of the 328-yard stretch of road where Hariri and 22 others were killed. The seaside boulevard had been closed for more than two years while the U.N. scoured the ground, adjacent buildings and the nearby Mediterranean Sea for evidence. Among the first to drive through was a passenger minivan, whose driver stopped, got out of the vehicle, knelt and kissed the ground, saying: "God have mercy on your soul." Earlier, Carole Farhat, who survived the bombing two years ago, watched as laborers filled the bomb crater with gravel and paved over it. She said she was glad to be alive "to enjoy this moment." "I've come to see the spot where I was seconds away from death. It might be a good sign for Lebanon and for us," said Farhat, who was thrown in the air by the bombing as she crossed the road. She lost much of her hearing and sustained injuries to her eyes. Daniel Germani, an engineer who was also injured in the bombing, said the reopening of the road would allow his team to repair the famous St. George Hotel, which was severely damaged in the blast. Five hotel employees were killed and eight were wounded, he said. He estimated damages to the hotel at $10 million, saying they had yet to receive compensation. The U.N. resolution gives the Lebanese parliament a last chance to establish the tribunal itself. If it doesn't act by June 10, the U.N. decision will automatically "enter into force." Saad Hariri, leader of the parliamentary majority and the son of the late prime minister, and Saniora have extended a hand to the opposition after the tribunal's approval. But ratification by the parliament so far appears unlikely entangled. Saad Hariri said after the vote late Wednesday the decision was a turning point in Lebanon that would protect the country from further assassinations. The vote is a "victory the world has given to oppressed Lebanon and a victory for an oppressed Lebanon in the world," he said, holding back tears at the end of his televised speech. Saniora, a longtime confidant of Rafik Hariri, also called the tribunal "a triumph for Lebanon against injustice, crime and tyranny." He urged the Lebanese to put their differences behind, saying the approval of the tribunal was a "positive step" for renewed dialogue. &copy; 2007 and portal sites All contents &copy; Copyright 2006 newsreview.info N.E. Winchester - PO Box 1248 - Roseburg, OR 97470
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/A/AFGHAN_HELICOPTER_DOWN?SITE=ORROS&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Police & Fire Logs Click & Vote Poll I Want to Know Homing in on Housing Douglas County & Manage Account News Racks and Dealers LATEST NEWS from AP Wire May 31, 9:59 AM EDT 5 Americans Among 7 Dead in Afghan Crash Chopper Attack: 7 Military Killed in Afghanistan A-P correspondent Jason Straziuso (straz-YOO'-soh) reports the Taliban claims it downed the helicopter. Landmine Education Becoming a Priority in Afghanistan A Children's Oasis in Kabul Rebirth of Afghan Art Kabul: Five Years After the Taliban's Fall 5 Americans Among 7 Dead in Afghan Crash NATO Says Copter Down in Afghanistan US General: Army Avoids Civilian Deaths American Remains in Afghan Jail General: U.S. Airstrikes Killed Taliban Afghanistan (AP) -- NATO troops on Thursday secured the wreckage of a CH-47 Chinook helicopter apparently shot down by Taliban militants, an attack that killed everyone on board - five U.S. soldiers, a Canadian and a Briton, officials said. NATO said troops going to the crash site in southern Helmand province were ambushed by enemy fighters, and the unit called in an airstrike "to eliminate the enemy threat." It did not say if the troops were from the U.S.-led coalition, NATO's force or the Afghan army. One civilian was injured by gunfire. Maj. John Thomas, a spokesman for NATO's International Security Assistance Force, said there would be a full investigation into Wednesday's crash. "We will try to determine everything that happened and to fully investigate the site," he said. A U.S. military official, who insisted on speaking anonymously because the crash was still under investigation, said initial reports suggested the helicopter was hit with a rocket-propelled grenade. A purported Taliban spokesman, Qari Yousef Ahmadi, claimed in a phone call to The Associated Press that militants shot the helicopter down in the province, the world's largest opium poppy-growing region where combat has been heavy in recent months. Ahmadi did not offer any proof for his claim, but he specified the helicopter crashed in the Kajaki district hours before NATO reported that information. Kajaki is the site of a large U.S.-funded hydroelectric dam now being repaired so it can provide electricity to the southern city of Kandahar. British troops, who make up the bulk of the forces in Helmand province, have been engaged in fierce fighting around the dam protecting it. The Chinook, a heavy transport helicopter with two rotors, can carry about 40 soldiers plus a small crew. The fact it was flying at night suggested the aircraft might have been carrying troops on a nighttime air assault. The NATO force, which is responsible for a countrywide counterinsurgency campaign, has 37,000 soldiers, including about 14,000 Americans. There are 12,000 U.S. troops in the separate coalition, which trains the Afghan army and conducts Special Forces anti-terrorism operations. Helicopter crashes in Afghanistan have been relatively rare. A Chinook crashed in February in the southern province of Zabul, killing eight U.S. personnel. Officials ruled out enemy fire as the cause. In May 2006, another Chinook crashed attempting a nighttime landing on a small mountaintop in eastern Kunar province, killing 10 U.S. soldiers. In 2005, a U.S. helicopter crashed in Kunar, after apparently being hit by an RPG, killing 16 Americans. Also Thursday, Afghan and NATO forces battled suspected Taliban in Helmand's Sangin district. The Defense Ministry said "tens of enemies" were killed or wounded, but did not provide further detail. In western Farah province, insurgents attacked the Pusht Rod district late Wednesday, and ensuing clashes with police left 10 militants dead and 15 wounded, the Interior Ministry said. Retreating insurgents left behind one body and one wounded militant. Elsewhere, a senior military officer said the U.S. had "the Taliban on their heels" in Afghanistan. Brig. Gen. Perry Wiggins, deputy director of operations for the Joint Chiefs of Staff, told Pentagon reporters that "the Taliban has suffered numerous losses and has suffered losses to their senior leadership over this past month" in southern and eastern Afghanistan. As a result, the Taliban has "reverted to asymmetric-type, small-scale, high-profile attacks," he said. Mullah Dadullah, a one-legged veteran who orchestrated an intensifying campaign of suicide attacks and beheadings, was killed in an operation in southern Afghanistan this month. He had been considered the top Taliban field commander. Still, Wiggins said that as the poppy harvest ends, more insurgents might join the battle. "So the fight's not over," he said. "But we'll continue to take the offensive through several of the operations we have in Afghanistan, and hopefully ... continue to inflict casualties on the Taliban." Associated Press writers Lolita Baldor in Washington and Noor Khan in Kandahar, Afghanistan, contributed to this report. &copy; 2007 and portal sites All contents &copy; Copyright 2006 newsreview.info N.E. Winchester - PO Box 1248 - Roseburg, OR 97470
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/S/SUDAN_SANCTIONS?SITE=TNJAC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News @ jacksonsun.com Welcome to The Jackson Sun &mdash; Jackson, TN Jun 4, 2:40 PM EDT Some Say U.S. Sanctions on Sudan Weak By ALFRED de MONTESQUIOU AP Photo/ALFRED DE MONTESQUIOU Latest News from Sudan Some Say U.S. Sanctions on Sudan Weak Sudanese Rally Against U.S. Sanctions Questions Arise Over Darfur Peace Force U.N.: Hundreds Flee Darfur After Attack Former Rebels Attack AU Forces in Darfur Sudan (AP) -- Business leaders here are predicting that new U.S. sanctions imposed because of violence in Sudan's Darfur region will have little effect on the country's booming oil-driven economy, mostly because the measures avoid targeting key Chinese interests. Last year, Sudan's economy grew by 12 percent, according to the International Monetary Fund. That growth was propelled by the estimated 500,000 barrels of oil produced each day - two-thirds of them bought by China. The U.S. sanctions announced last week target 31 Sudanese firms and three individuals, including a rebel leader linked to the bloodshed in the Darfur region. More than 200,000 people have been killed and 2.5 million forced from their homes in Darfur during four years of fighting between Sudanese forces and rebels. The newly sanctioned companies join 132 other Sudanese firms already banned from doing business with any U.S. company or bank. Abdul Rahim Hamdi, a former Sudanese finance minister who advises the government on economic matters, noted that only Sudanese oil-drilling companies are on the new sanctions list, not Chinese or other foreign corporations - some of which pay huge royalties to Sudan's government. "The Chinese companies are the only big players, but the Americans have carefully avoided targeting them," Hamdi said. Besides, after a decade of sanctions, Sudan has few commercial ties to the United States. Nearly three-quarters of Sudan's trade is with Arab and Asian nations, Hamdi said. U.S. authorities have defended the new measures, saying they not only broaden the target list but also provide better methods to track down embargo evaders. "Tougher new enforcement techniques," including "forensic accounting" have been used to select the newly targeted companies and to make sure all 163 now on the sanctions list are truly barred from the dollar economy, U.S. embassy spokesman Joel Maybury said. U.S. officials also dispute the idea that they are leery of disrupting Chinese relations over Darfur. "We can very definitely say that the issue of Sudan is on the United States-China bilateral agenda," U.S. Deputy Secretary of State John Negroponte said last week. Sudanese firms facing U.S. sanctions include most state-owned or state-controlled companies, ranging from oil drilling and transport firms to insurance companies. The U.S. measures and the violence in Darfur are likely topics of discussion when the Group of Eight industrialized countries meet this week at a summit in Germany. President Bush has directed American officials to meet with allies to try to draft a new U.N. Security Council resolution that would impose multilateral pressure on Sudan, in addition to the unilateral actions by the U.S. But China, which holds veto power in the Security Council, has urged negotiations with Sudan rather than sanctions. For now, the only Sudanese company that truly risks being affected by the U.S. measures, Hamdi contends, is Sudatel, Sudan's largest cell phone provider, because it is listed on the stock exchange in the United Arab Emirates and is largely owned by foreign investors. Sudatel executives could not be reached for comment. Sudanese businesses have long adjusted to U.S. sanctions, business leaders said. A prominent Khartoum financier, who asked not be identified because of the sensitivity of the issue, said Sudanese firms know how to avoid dollar transactions by using the euro instead. Sudanese firms operate through foreign holding companies or joint ventures to evade restrictions, the financier said. Analysts like Alex Vines, the head of the Africa program at the British think tank Chatham House, also predicted the U.S. sanctions will have little actual effect on Sudan's economy. "It's more of a political signal," Vines said. &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All &copy;2006 The Jackson Sun. Users of this site agree to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/R/RUSSIA_PUTIN?SITE=TNJAC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News @ jacksonsun.com Welcome to The Jackson Sun &mdash; Jackson, TN Jun 4, 3:44 PM EDT Putin Attacks West Ahead of G-8 Summit Landslide Damages Famed Valley in Russia Putin Attacks West Ahead of G-8 Summit Russia Warns U.S. About Missile System Police Seize Drafts of Books on Putin Group Warns Nuke Fuel Dump May Explode Putin Blasts U.S. Missile Defense Plan Latest Photos from Russia (AP) -- President Vladimir Putin called himself the world's only "absolute and pure democrat" in an interview published Monday, and launched scathing attacks on the U.S. and Europe ahead of this week's Group of Eight summit. At the same time, the 54-year-old Putin hinted that he to leave the public stage after all when his second term expires next year. "I am far from pension age and it would be absurd just to sit at home doing nothing," he told a group of reporters invited to dinner over the weekend. Despite Russia's agreement last month to tone down the rhetoric, Putin's statements exposed vast gaps between Russia and the West ahead of this week's Group of Eight summit. He called Britain's decision to demand the extradition of the man suspected of killing former KGB agent Alexander Litvinenko with a radioactive poison an act of "stupidity." The interview touched on much that the rest of the world finds disturbing about Putin's Russia: the backsliding on democracy, the increasing assertion of military power, the general perception of a leader who feels immune to international criticism. To the many Westerners who say he has rolled back Russia's democratic reforms, Putin responded with the startling assertion that he is the world's one true champion of democracy. "I am an absolute and pure democrat," Putin said. "But you know what the misfortune is? Not even a misfortune but a real tragedy? It's that I am alone, there simply aren't others like this in the world." The transcript noted that Putin laughed when making that comment, suggesting he was joking. A few moments later he added: "After the death of Mahatma Gandhi, there's nobody to talk to." Sandwiched between his acid criticisms and ironic assertions was a brief but brutal criticism of the West. "We look at what has been created in North America - horror: torture, homelessness, Guantanamo, detention without courts or investigation," he said. "You see what's going on in Europe: harsh treatment of demonstrators, the use of rubber bullets, tear gas in one capital, the killing of demonstrators in the streets in another," he added, in an apparent reference to the death of an ethnic Russian in the Estonian capital during protests over the removal of a Soviet-era war memorial. Rather than try to soothe nerves before the G-8 summit in Germany, Putin repeated, and even amplified, recent Kremlin criticism of the United States - including his allegation in February that the United States was engaging in a "hyper-use of power," and Russian officials' denunciation of purported Western attempts to destabilize Russia by funding pro-democracy groups. The Russian president's comments came despite last month's agreement between Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice to tone down the rhetoric on both sides. Much of the toughest talk from the Kremlin has focused on U.S. plans to build a missile-defense system in Europe, which Washington insists is aimed at preventing attacks by rogue states such as Iran and North Korea rather than Russia. Putin renewed the verbal offensive in his weekend interview, in chilling comments that evoked the balance-of-terror language of the Cold War. "We are being told the anti-missile defense system is targeted against something that does not exist. Doesn't it seem funny to you, to say the least?" a clearly irritated Putin said. "If a part of the strategic nuclear potential of the United States appears in Europe and, in the opinion of our military specialists will threaten us, then we will have to take appropriate steps in response," Putin said. "What kind of steps? We will have to have new targets in Europe." These could be targeted with "ballistic or cruise missiles or maybe a completely new system." National Security Adviser Stephen Hadley, asked aboard Air Force One about Putin's comments on the missile shield, said there has been "some escalation in the rhetoric." "We think that that is not helpful. We would like to have a constructive dialogue with Russia on this issue. We have had it in the past," Hadley said. Russia's relations with the West also are troubled by its refusal to turn over Andrei Lugovoi, the man whom Britain says it has enough evidence to charge in last year's fatal poisoning of former KGB agent Alexander Litvinenko. The case raised fears that Moscow has returned to its Soviet-era practice of killing dissidents abroad. Russia refuses to turn over Lugovoi, saying its constitution forbids extradition of Russian citizens to face prosecution abroad. Putin called Britain's demand "stupidity." "If they didn't know (about the constitutional prohibition) it's a low level of competence and thus we have doubts about what they're doing there," Putin said. "And if they knew and did this, it's simply politics. "This is bad and that is bad - from all sides it's just stupidity," Putin said. Putin, less than a year away from the end of his second and final four-year term in office, told reporters he believes Russian presidents should serve longer terms. But he did not say whether he believes his current term should be extended. Over the years, he has consistently rejected suggestions that the constitution be amended to allow him to seek a third consecutive term, and during his annual address to parliament in April said it would be his last as president. But Putin's ambiguous comments seemed certain to feed speculation that he would seek to stay in power beyond the spring of 2008. At the very least, his suggestion could discourage other G-8 leaders from treating him as a lame duck. "Four years is a fairly short time," Putin said. "It seems to me that in today's Russia five, six or seven years would be acceptable, but the number of terms still should be limited." Russia is scheduled to hold presidential elections in March. Putin, who was re-elected in 2004 with more than 71 percent of the vote, has presided over one of the most prosperous periods in Russian history and enjoys sky-high approval ratings. Putin has not publicly said whom he would prefer to see succeed him - an endorsement that would carry immense influence, since that candidate could instantly expect the support of the Kremlin and its allies. Some leaders in post-Soviet states have called referendums to approve extension of their terms. But these moves have been widely criticized abroad as naked power-grabs. While Putin seems increasingly to scorn his Western critics, the move would create an uproar that he might not want to face. &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All &copy;2006 The Jackson Sun. Users of this site agree to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/U/US_AFGHANISTAN?SITE=TNJAC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News @ jacksonsun.com Welcome to The Jackson Sun &mdash; Jackson, TN Jun 4, 3:57 PM EDT Gates: Taliban Fighters Use Iran Weapons Defense Secretary Robert Gates says he's convinced that American and NATO forces are making steady progress against the Taliban. (note audio quality) Landmine Education Becoming a Priority in Afghanistan A Children's Oasis in Kabul Rebirth of Afghan Art Kabul: Five Years After the Taliban's Fall Gates: Taliban Fighters Use Iran Weapons Karzai Wants Body Exchanged for Hostages NATO Service Member Dies in Afghanistan Iraq-Style Bomb Found in Afghanistan Attack on Afghan Cop's Home Kills 15 Afghanistan (AP) -- Defense Secretary Robert Gates said Monday that Iranian weapons are falling into the hands of anti-government Taliban fighters but he stopped short of blaming Tehran. Afghan President Hamid Karzai seemed to dismiss the matter. At a news conference at the presidential palace, Gates offered possible explanations for the flow of weapons from Iran to this war-scarred country, including smuggling. He mentioned no specific weapons, but NATO officials recently cited the discovery in Kabul of an armor-piercing roadside bomb, the same type U.S. officials have long complained are entering Iraq from Iran. "There have been indications over the past few months of weapons coming in from Iran," Gates told reporters with Karzai at his side. "We do not have any information about whether the government of Iran is supporting this, is behind it, or whether it's smuggling." Gates, on his second visit to Afghanistan since becoming Pentagon chief last December, said that while the weapons appear to be going to Taliban fighters, some may be headed to criminals in the Afghan drug trade. Asked his own view, Karzai appeared eager to give the Iranian government a pass. He said there was no evidence of Iranian government involvement, adding, "Iran and Afghanistan have never been as friendly as they are today." There is no reason for Iran to aid the Taliban, Karzai said. "It is in the interests of our brothers in Iran" to support the development of a more stable and prosperous Afghanistan. He said that also applied to Pakistan, on Afghanistan's eastern border, where U.S. officials say Taliban fighters have found haven and easy passage for cross-border attacks on U.S., NATO and Afghan troops. A prevalent view among U.S. officials is that Tehran, while not an ally of the Taliban, is seizing any feasible opportunity in both Iraq and Afghanistan to complicate U.S. stabilization efforts and to tie down the American military amid tensions between Tehran and Washington over Iran's nuclear program. Later, Gates flew to Kandahar in southern Afghanistan, at the heart of the fight against the Taliban, where he conferred privately with U.S. and NATO commanders. Afterward he flew to Bishkek, Kyrgyzstan to meet with government officials on Tuesday. Before the Kabul news conference, Gates flew by helicopter to Camp Morehead, a sparse military outpost ringed by mountain peaks several miles outside Kabul. American and French special forces there are training Afghan commandos in stealthy operations U.S. officials believe are crucial to undermining the Taliban. The first class of recruits is four weeks into its 12-week course. At Morehead, Gates met Gen. Bismullah Khan, one of the most well-known of the former mujahadeen fighters from the days of Soviet occupation. The general, now head of the Afghan National Army, gave Gates a large book that he said featured descriptions of battlefield exploits by Ahmed Shah Massoud, who played a leading role in driving the Soviet occupation army out of Afghanistan. Massoud, later an Afghan minister of defense, was assassinated by al-Qaida agents two days before the 9/11 terrorist attacks. In an interview with reporters traveling with Gates, Khan said he is pushing the U.S. to accelerate the training and equipping of the Afghan National Army to hasten the day when it can fight the Taliban without relying on U.S. air and ground support. "The problem we have is that we are not able to conduct operations independently," Khan said through an interpreter. He cited specifically a lack of Afghan air support and the kind of "direct fire" support provided by tanks. "We are looking forward to the day when we can fight the enemy independently." The general was asked how soon he thought his forces could function without U.S. military support. "We ask for it to be as soon as possible," he replied. "I will ask the secretary of defense to expedite the (training and equipping) process so we can do this. The only way to defeat the enemy is to become independent." The U.S. is committed to training and equipping an Afghan army of 70,000 soldiers, hoping to reach that figure by December 2008. "It's not going to be enough," Khan said. "We will ask for more." &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All &copy;2006 The Jackson Sun. Users of this site agree to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/G/GUANTANAMO_TRIALS?SITE=TNJAC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News @ jacksonsun.com Welcome to The Jackson Sun &mdash; Jackson, TN Jun 4, 5:12 PM EDT Guantanamo Judge Dismisses Terror Case By ANDREW O. SELSKY From Suburbia to Guantanamo: The Odyssey of Majid Khan Assault with Bodily Fluids Failure to Follow Rules Hicks' stipulation of fact Pentagon acknowledges Geneva Convention protections D.O.D. list of Gitmo detainees Detainee Usama Hassan Ahmend Abu Kabir: I like my watch because it is durable Detainee Abdul Matin: Younger men and women use this watch everywhere Unnamed detainee: It's a watch. I use it like a watch Feroz Ali Abbasi's handwritten note released by the Pentagon Summarized sworn detainee statement released by the Pentagon Guantanamo Judge Dismisses Terror Case Apparent Gitmo Suicide Was Saudi Veteran Detainee Appeals for Reporter's Release Gitmo Detainee Fears Returning to Jordan US Commander: Guantanamo More Controlled Criminal complaint against Eljvir Duka in Fort Dix plot case Hearing Transcript: Waleed Mohammed bin Attash Hearing Transcript: Khalid Sheikh Mohammed Hearing Transcript Abu Faraj al-Libi Hearing Transcript: Ramzi Binalshibh Declassified Report: Iraq 'Cause Celebre' for Extremists Group Denies Link to NYC Terror Plot Informant Helped Bust Alleged JFK Plot Man Jailed After False Terror Threat U.S. Warns of Terror in Philippine Towns Gordon Brown Plans New Anti-Terror Laws BAY NAVAL BASE, Cuba (AP) -- A military judge dismissed terrorism-related charges Monday against a prisoner charged with killing an American soldier in Afghanistan, delivering a blow to the Bush administration's attempt to try Guantanamo detainees in military courts. The ruling raised questions about whether the U.S. would have to further revise procedures for prosecuting prisoners, leading to major delays. The chief of military defense attorneys at Guantanamo Bay argued that the ruling could spell the end of the war-crimes trial system set up last year by Congress and President Bush after the Supreme Court threw out the previous system. But a law professor said it appeared the judge left open the possibility of filing new charges. A military prosecutor said the ruling would be appealed, and the U.S. military entity responsible for holding the military trials said it believed Congress intended to grant jurisdiction to try suspected Taliban and al-Qaida members and supporters. Canadian detainee Omar Khadr, who was 15 when he was captured after a deadly firefight in Afghanistan and who is now 20, will remain at the remote U.S. military base along with some 380 other men suspected of links to al-Qaida and the Taliban. The judge, Army Col. Peter Brownback, said he had no choice but to throw out the Khadr case because he had been classified as an "enemy combatant" by a military panel years earlier - and not as an "alien unlawful enemy combatant." The Military Commissions Act, signed by Bush last year, says only those classified as "unlawful" enemy combatants can face war trials here, Brownback noted during the arraignment in a hilltop courtroom. Later Monday, a lawyer representing the only other detainee charged with war crimes, Salim Ahmed Hamdan, asked another military judge to throw out that case, based on the Khadr ruling. The judge, Navy Capt. Keith Allred, called a recess before the prosecutor could make a statement. Marine Col. Dwight Sullivan, head of the Guantanamo defense attorneys, said the dismissal in the Khadr case would have "huge" impact because none of the detainees held at this isolated military base in southeast Cuba has been found to be an "unlawful" enemy combatant. "It is not just a technicality; it's the latest demonstration that this newest system just does not work," Sullivan told journalists. "It is a system of justice that does not comport with American values." Sullivan said that in order to reclassify the detainees as "unlawful" combatants, the whole review system would have to be overhauled, a time-consuming act. The Pentagon said the issue was little more than semantics. A spokesman said the system was not dealing with lawful combatants, who fight in uniform for a national army. It was set up to determine if a detainee acted as an "unlawful enemy combatant" who was not in an internationally recognized military, did not wear a uniform or rank insignia, did not carry arms openly and was not a party to the Geneva Conventions, he said. "It is our belief that the concept was implicit that all the Guantanamo detainees who were designated as `enemy combatants' ... were in fact unlawful," Navy Cmdr. Jeffrey Gordon told The Associated Press. Carl Tobias, a law professor at the University of Richmond, said that because Brownback dismissed the case without prejudice, the U.S. may be able to retry Khadr. He also said it is unclear whether all detainees would have to be reclassified. A military spokeswoman, Army Maj. Beth Kubala, said the prosecution had five days in which to file an appeal. But Sullivan said the court designated to hear any appeal - known as the court of military commissions review - doesn't even exist. Kubala told AP Television News that Brownback's ruling underscored the fairness of the system. "The military commissions procedures and rules are robust and grant significant rights to the accused," she said. The only other Guantanamo detainee currently charged with crimes is Hamdan, who is accused of chauffeuring Osama bin Laden and being the al-Qaida chief's bodyguard. The third detainee charged under the new system, Australian David Hicks, pleaded guilty in March to providing material support to al-Qaida and is serving a nine-month sentence in Australia. Brownback's ruling came just minutes into Khadr's arraignment on charges he committed murder in violation of the law of war, attempted murder in violation of the law of war, conspiracy, providing material support for terrorism and spying. Khadr allegedly killed a U.S. Army soldier with a grenade in the firefight, in which he was wounded. He appeared in the courtroom with a beard and wearing an olive-green prison uniform. "The charges are dismissed without prejudice," Brownback pronounced as he adjourned the proceeding. A prosecutor, Army Capt. Keith Petty, said he had been prepared to show Khadr was an unlawful combatant because he fought for al-Qaida, and videotapes showed Khadr making and planting explosives targeting American soldiers. Khadr seemed oblivious to the ruling. He calmly watched the judge throw out the case - looking not at Brownback but at a computer screen at the defense table that showed a live TV broadcast of the proceedings. Khadr could see himself on the screen The U.S. military has hoped to accelerate its prosecutions of Guantanamo detainees, with the Pentagon saying it expects to eventually charge about 80 of the 380 prisoners held at this isolated base, but questions lingered about the legitimacy of the process. The Supreme Court, ruling in favor of a lawsuit brought by Hamdan, last June threw out a previous military tribunal system that was set up in the wake of the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks, calling it unconstitutional. Congress responded with new guidelines for war-crimes trials and Bush signed them into law. Hamdan's attorney, Navy Lt. Cmdr. Charles Swift, told The Associated Press that he will challenge the new system as unconstitutional. For example, the Military Commissions Act retroactively made certain acts, such as conspiracy a crime, Swift said. "This case raises significant questions" about the separation of powers, Swift said. "Congress cannot violate the Constitution to fix things ... but they are backdating anything and making it a crime." Hamdan is charged with conspiracy - centered on his alleged membership in al-Qaida and purported role in plotting to attack civilians and civilian targets - and with providing material support for terrorism. As part of the second charge, Hamdan is accused of transporting at least one SA-7 surface-to-air missile to shoot down U.S. and coalition military aircraft in Afghanistan in November 2001. The son of an alleged al-Qaida financier, Khadr is accused of killing U.S. Army Sgt. Christopher Speer with a grenade during a firefight in Afghanistan on July 27, 2002. Khadr's attorneys said he was a child soldier and should be rehabilitated, not imprisoned. "The U.S. will be the first country in modern history to try an individual who was a child at the time of the alleged war crimes," the attorneys said in a joint statement in April. &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All &copy;2006 The Jackson Sun. Users of this site agree to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/T/TERRORISM_PLOT_TRINIDAD?SITE=TNJAC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News @ jacksonsun.com Welcome to The Jackson Sun &mdash; Jackson, TN Jun 4, 4:38 PM EDT Group Denies Link to NYC Terror Plot Drug Convict Helped Bust JFK Plot New York City Mayor Michael Bloomberg says the city needs to take all potential attacks seriously. Criminal complaint against Eljvir Duka in Fort Dix plot case Hearing Transcript: Waleed Mohammed bin Attash Hearing Transcript: Khalid Sheikh Mohammed Hearing Transcript Abu Faraj al-Libi Hearing Transcript: Ramzi Binalshibh Declassified Report: Iraq 'Cause Celebre' for Extremists Group Denies Link to NYC Terror Plot Informant Helped Bust Alleged JFK Plot Man Jailed After False Terror Threat U.S. Warns of Terror in Philippine Towns Gordon Brown Plans New Anti-Terror Laws Alleged JFK Airport Terror Plot Map of JFK International Airport Alleged Terrorism Plot at JFK Airport PORT-OF-SPAIN, Trinidad (AP) -- The leader of a radical Trinidadian Muslim group denied Monday that his organization had any connection to four men accused of planning to attack New York's John F. Kennedy International Airport. Yasin Abu Bakr, the leader of Jamaat al Muslimeen, told The Associated Press he knew "nothing" about the alleged plan to bomb a fuel pipeline feeding the airport, a plot authorities say was hatched by a group that included a former Guyanese politician. U.S. authorities claim the alleged plotters sought support in Trinidad from Jamaat al Muslimeen, which staged a deadly coup attempt in the Caribbean nation in 1990. The men did not receive such support, according to court documents. But the documents also say that Abdel Nur, a Guyanese suspect thought to be still at large in Trinidad, said he met in May with Abu Bakr at his compound in Trinidad and the Islamic leader suggested that he return later with others involved "to discuss the plan in detail." Nur allegedly said the Jamaat al Muslimeen leader also wanted to do further checks on Russell Defreitas, the 63-year-old accused mastermind of the plot, and an unidentified confidential informant who had infiltrated the group, the documents said. Abu Bakr declined to say if he knew the men, but also denied any involvement. "I know nothing about these men, and I have nothing to do with whatever they are being charged for," he said in his first public comments since U.S. authorities disclosed the plot on Saturday. Two of the suspects - Abdul Kadir, a former member of Guyana's parliament, and Kareem Ibrahim of Trinidad - are in custody in Trinidad. Nur was being sought by Trinidadian authorities. Defreitas, a U.S. citizen native to Guyana and former JFK air cargo employee, was jailed in the United States. Abu Bakr's group, often accused of aiming to create an Islamic state in Trinidad, describes itself simply as a religious organization. The group stormed Parliament and took the prime minister and his Cabinet hostage in a 1990 rebellion that left 24 dead - the only Islamic revolt in the Western Hemisphere. The rebels eventually surrendered and were later pardoned. It is not known to have international reach, although a member was convicted of trying to smuggle 70 assault rifles to Trinidad from Florida in 2005. Abu Bakr faces charges stemming from a 2005 sermon in which he called for war against rich Muslims who refuse to pay zakaat, an Islamic tithe used to alleviate poverty. The following week, he was arrested by police who razed the group's compound and charged him with sedition and incitement to violence. "You know why they are linking me with this so-called plot is to bias the minds of jurors who will be sitting in my case," he said. Separately, a lawyer for the two men held in Trinidad said they would fight extradition to the United States. Ibrahim and Kadir made their initial court appearance Monday for extradition on one count each of conspiracy to commit a terrorist act against the U.S. government. "We will be opposing extradition," said Rajid Persad, a lawyer who represents both men. The judge set another hearing for June 11 to consider bail and scheduled an extradition hearing for Aug. 2. Farid Scoon, another lawyer for the men, said they intend to seek bail. The extradition fight could be a drawn-out affair. Ibrahim and Kadir could appeal all the way to the Privy Council in Britain, the highest court of appeal for the former British territory. &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All &copy;2006 The Jackson Sun. Users of this site agree to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/C/CHINA_REMEMBERING_TIANANMEN?SITE=TNJAC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News @ jacksonsun.com Welcome to The Jackson Sun &mdash; Jackson, TN Jun 4, 3:19 PM EDT Tiananmen Square Survivors Seek Reform China Won't Adopt Caps on Gas Emissions Tiananmen Square Survivors Seek Reform Thousands Displaced by China Quake Water Back on After Algae Clog in China China Rejects U.S. Warning on Toothpaste (AP) -- For the first time in 18 years, Ding Zilin marked the anniversary of her son's death with a visit to the place where he was shot amid a violent government crackdown on protests at Tiananmen Square. Police usually are quick to snuff out any memorials in Beijing for those killed in the crackdown that culminated in June 4, 1989, while China's government still calls the seven-week Tiananmen protest a counter-revolutionary riot and has yet to fully disclose what happened. But with China's human rights record under renewed scrutiny ahead of the 2008 Olympics, survivors of the bloody crackdown in Beijing marked the event's 18th anniversary on Monday by demanding political reform. And Ding, who for years was placed under house arrest during Tiananmen anniversaries and other sensitive times, wept on the eve of the anniversary as she placed a photo of her son on the spot where he died a few kilometers west of Tiananmen. "It's been 18 years and I felt like I let him down and let down the others who died with him," she said of her son, who was killed as he hid behind a flower bed from soldiers enforcing martial law on the night of June 3. He had turned 17 the day before. In Hong Kong on Monday - the only place in China where a large, public commemoration is allowed - tens of thousands gathered to mourn the dead at a candlelight vigil. In Beijing's Tiananmen Square, there were no immediate reports of protests and only tourists gathered to watch a daily flag-raising ceremony amid tight security. Ding, co-founder of the Tiananmen Mothers, a group that represents families of those who died, said police did not try to stop her Sunday night, though plainclothes agents may have been observing the vigil. "Right now, this is all I can do. Not getting justice for them, we're still pushing for it but there's been no response," said Ding, who has campaigned to get the government to acknowledge those killed in the crackdown and compensate their families. "Their spirits are obviously not at peace." Most of the surviving students who led the Tiananmen protests have drifted away from activism and into careers in business or other professions, but prominent student leader Wang Dan has continued to push for political reform in China as he pursues a doctorate in history at Harvard University. He said in a videotaped message that China's recent economic success cannot make up for the crackdown and killed hundreds, maybe thousands, of people. "Who can guarantee things that happened 18 years ago will not happen 18 years later?" Wang said. "Even if we become more powerful economically, China still cannot rise in international society." Another former student leader, Wu'er Kaixi, lamented that the memory of Tiananmen appears to be fading worldwide. "The Chinese government is unwilling to face the truth and seems to hope that the 'problem' of June 4 will simply go away," Wu'er, who has worked as a businessman and radio broadcaster in Taiwan, told The Associated Press. "For the most part, the world seems willing to go along with this." In the former British colony of Hong Kong, many residents in 1989 supported the Tiananmen protesters and the violence raised fears that the Communist leadership would not honor its promise to allow Hong Kong the civil liberties its people enjoyed under British rule. But 10 years after the hand-over, the city still enjoys freedoms that people on the mainland can only dream about. Street protests are common and the press frequently criticizes the government, though media watchdogs say self-censorship is common. A candlelight vigil Monday night filled up six soccer fields at Victoria Park near downtown Hong Kong. Amy Chan, 60, brought her 5-year-old granddaughter. "Although she is young, we need to let her know the history," Chan said. Tonny Chin, 50, a clerk, said he has attended the vigil every year since 1989. "The June fourth incident is a tragedy for China," he said. "We need to vindicate it." New York-based Human Rights Watch said Beijing's failure to account for the crackdown casts a pall on its campaign to project a new image ahead of the Olympics in 14 months. "Beijing - and by extension, the 2008 Olympic Games - will remain tarnished by this legacy until the Chinese government provides a complete and truthful account of what happened in June 1989," said Sophie Richardson, deputy Asia director of the human rights group. Associated Press writers Dikky Sinn and William Foreman in Hong Kong and Annie Huang in Taipei, Taiwan, contributed to this report. &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All &copy;2006 The Jackson Sun. Users of this site agree to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WAR_CRIMES_TAYLOR?SITE=TNJAC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News @ jacksonsun.com Welcome to The Jackson Sun &mdash; Jackson, TN Jun 4, 12:52 PM EDT Taylor Boycotts War Crimes Trial Opening Charles Taylor's attorney, Karim Khan, reads a statement from Taylor explaining why he's boycotting the opening of his trial. Judges order new Milosevic medical exam Iran prepares criminal complaint vs. Saddam Taylor Boycotts War Crimes Trial Opening Massacre Survivors Sue U.N., Dutch Gov't Timeline of Charles Taylor in Liberia Preliminary Crime Report, Jan.-June 2005 THE HAGUE, Netherlands (AP) -- Former Liberian President Charles Taylor boycotted the opening of his war crimes trial Monday and his assigned lawyer walked out of court in a dramatic opening to the first such case brought against a former African leader. The trial was ordered to continue anyway, and the chief prosecutor outlined the horrific murders and mutilations of thousands of civilians in neighboring Sierra Leone by forces allegedly under Taylor's control in 1991-2002. Defense lawyer Karim Khan said Taylor had fired him and wanted to act has his own attorney. Khan walked out even though the presiding judge repeatedly directed him to continue to represent Taylor, if only for the opening day. Apologizing and defying threats of contempt of court, Khan gathered his files and left. "This is not defense counsel making some cheap trick," Khan told The Associated Press outside court. Taylor "thought this was a railroad to a conviction and in those circumstances, he exercised his right to terminate my representation and to represent himself." In presenting his case, Chief Prosecutor Stephen Rapp told how attackers would randomly murder people and enslave others to use as fighters, miners and farmers, Rapp said. Then "the attackers would mutilate - amputating arms, limbs, gouging eyes." Children were conscripted, and some were forced to kill their own parents, he added. Rapp said a judgment "will not bring back the dead from their graves, nor give back limbs to the thousands of amputees," but would give "some small measure of closure" to the people of Sierra Leone. Taylor, 59, has pleaded not guilty to 11 charges of war crimes and crimes against humanity. The court has no death sentence and no maximum sentence if he is convicted. The prosecution made a four-hour opening statement Monday, after which the case was adjourned for three weeks. It was unclear who would be sitting on the defense bench when it resumes June 25. The trial was expected to last 18 months. Taylor was not in court Monday, but in a letter read to judges by Khan, he claimed he had been prevented from seeing a court official mandated with making sure he is properly defended and that his one court-appointed attorney was heavily outgunned by the prosecution team of nine. "At one time I had confidence in this court's ability to dispense justice. Over time, it has become clear that confidence has been misplaced," Taylor's statement said. "I will not receive a fair trial." Taylor's supporters say he has been unfairly targeted by prosecutors and that his defense team has not had enough time to prepare. "He's taking the blame for what others did," said his daughter, Charen Taylor, who grew up in the United States and dropped out of college to help organize his defense. Rapp told the court Taylor had been assigned a lawyer, assistant attorneys, a special investigator and court funds. Presiding Judge Julia Sebutinde of Uganda repeatedly interrupted Khan's reading of Taylor's letter, demanding an explanation for Taylor's absence. "We are not interested in political speeches," she told the lawyer. But she also said Taylor's inability to see the court official overseeing defense issues was "worrying," and said it could delay the trial. She ordered court staff to arrange for the official, Vincent Nmehielle, to fly from Sierra Leone to meet with Taylor. The trial had been expected to be difficult and complex even before Monday's developments raised more questions about how the process would work. Despite the difficulties, though, the trial has been hailed as a watershed for war-torn western Africa. "It's a time in the history of Africa that the leaders ... go on notice that they just cannot destroy their own people for whatever purpose," said David Crane, a former chief prosecutor at the Special Court for Sierra Leone. The atrocities in Sierra Leone's 1991-2002 civil war are well-documented. Fighters - often children drugged and turned into merciless killers at brutal rebel training camps - murdered thousands of men, women and children and mutilated more by hacking off hands and limbs with axes and machetes. Women were raped and abducted to become sex slaves. Many victims had the initials of rebel groups carved into their skin with hot bayonets. Children were sent out with burlap bags to hack off and collect limbs and were punished if the bags were not full when they returned. When witnesses begin testifying, survivors, including amputees, will take the stand along with former allies from Taylor's inner sanctum who will be critical to proving he controlled rebels responsible for atrocities in another country. Many will testify anonymously for fears of reprisals from Taylor supporters, and some will be put in witness protection schemes after giving evidence. "Prosecutors will have to prove that the linkage exists between Taylor's alleged participation in the crimes and the crimes themselves," said Elise Keppler of Human Rights Watch. "There is no question these kinds of cases are difficult, they are complex." While the charges he faces refer to events in Sierra Leone, Taylor also is linked to brutality in his own country. At the Liberian capital's largest cemetery, where most of the tombstone dates are from the period of the country's 14-year civil war, four gravediggers listened to radio reports of the start of Taylor's trial Monday. One gravedigger, Flomo Tokpah, 54, said his older brother was killed by Taylor's forces, and that he was glad Taylor did not address the court himself. "I don't want to hear that wicked man's voice anymore," he said. But his co-worker, Teddy Taweh, 42, said Taylor "should face the court and tell people why he did what he did." From 1989 to 1997, Taylor led the rebel National Patriotic Front of Liberia, whose aim was to unseat then-President Samuel K. Doe. Taylor is believed to be one of the first warlords to recruit children, who were organized into a Small Boys Unit and christened with names like "Babykiller." Taylor was elected Liberia's president in 1997. Taylor was indicted in 2003, accused of sponsoring Sierra Leone's rebel Revolutionary United Front from 1996-2002 in exchange for diamonds. Taylor agreed to give up power and go into exile, but was arrested in Nigeria in March 2006. He was transferred to The Hague a year ago amid fears his trial in Sierra Leone could trigger fresh violence in the region. His trial will take place in a court room rented from the International Criminal Court by the U.N.-backed court that usually sits in Sierra Leone and was established to try those held most responsible for the Sierra Leonean war. Associated Press Writer Rukmini Callimachi in Monrovia, Liberia, contributed to this report. &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All &copy;2006 The Jackson Sun. Users of this site agree to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/L/LEBANON_VIOLENCE?SITE=TNJAC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News @ jacksonsun.com Welcome to The Jackson Sun &mdash; Jackson, TN Jun 4, 3:30 PM EDT Militants, Troops Battle at Lebanon Camp Militants, Troops Battle at Lebanon Camp Lebanese Army Battles Militants in Camp Syria Condemns U.N. Tribunal in Lebanon Syria, Hezbollah Condemn U.N. Tribunal Lebanese Woman Wounded by Leftover Bomb EL-HILWEH CAMP, Lebanon (AP) -- Islamic militants clashed with Lebanese troops at the country's biggest Palestinian refugee camp Monday, threatening to open a southern battle front that could complicate the army's effort to defeat al-Qaida-inspired extremists in the north. Two government soldiers and a militant were reported killed in fighting at the Ein el-Hilweh camp in the southern city of Sidon, which began when the Jund al-Sham group attacked army outposts late Sunday. The assault was seen as an attempt by Jund al-Sham to ease military pressure on an allied Islamic group, Fatah Islam, whose guerrillas have been battered by army attacks since May 20 in the Nahr el-Bared refugee camp near Tripoli in northern Lebanon. The bombardment of Nahr el-Bared has angered Palestinians in some of Lebanon's 11 other refugee camps and there were fears fighting could spread as a senior Fatah Islam commander at Nahr el-Bared vowed Monday to take the battle to Ein el-Hilweh. Also Monday, a bomb exploded in an empty bus parked in the Christian neighborhood of Bouchrieh east of Beirut, injuring 10 passers-by, officials said. There was no claim of responsibility, but a string of bombings has hit the capital area since the fighting began at Nahr el-Bared. More than 100 people were reported dead in the 16 days of fighting between the army and Fatah Islam, the worst internal violence since the end of Lebanon's 1975-90 civil war. After clashes in Nahr el-Bared early in the day, Lebanese artillery resumed pounding Fatah Islam hideouts, sending up plumes of black smoke as more armored vehicles moved into the camp. The army escalated its offensive Friday after the militants, who embrace al-Qaida-style militancy and doctrine, rejected government demands to surrender and vowed to fight to the death. Ten soldiers were killed and 44 wounded at Nahr el-Bared since Friday, including four hurt Monday by a militant mortar shell. Army casualties since the fighting began stood at 45 dead at Nahr el-Bared and two at Ein el-Hilweh. About 60 Fatah Islam militants were reported killed. At least 20 civilians were dead at Nahr el-Bared, but recent civilian casualties were unknown. On Monday, the International Red Cross evacuated a wounded civilian and 17 women and children who wanted to leave the camp. Most of its 31,000 residents had already fled to a nearby refugee camp. Fighting erupted at Ein el-Hilweh on Sunday evening when Jund al-Sham militants fired rocket-propelled grenades and assault rifles at nearby army checkpoints. Soldiers fired back with machine guns and cannons. Shooting raged through the night, then quieted Monday morning. Two Lebanese soldiers were killed and five wounded in the clashes. A Jund al-Sham official was wounded and several houses belonging to members of the group were set on fire by army shells, Lebanese security and Palestinian officials said. Also killed was a militant from another Islamic group, Asbat al-Ansar, that refused to join the fighting and was trying mediate an end to the confrontation, said the officials, who spoke on condition of anonymity because they were not authorized to talk to journalists. The clashes at Ein el-Hilweh, home to 60,000 Palestinians, underscored the complexities facing the army. Like other crowded camps, it became a haven for extremist groups like Jund al-Sham and criminal gangs as troops stayed out of the camps under a nearly 40-year-old arrangement giving Palestinians control of their affairs. People who fled the shooting Sunday night at Ein el-Hilweh returned briefly during Monday's lull to pick up some belongings. Militiamen loyal to Palestinian President Mahmoud Abbas' Fatah faction stood on the camp's main street, watching militant gunmen on side streets. Secular factions at Ein el-Hilweh complained that Islamic groups were shielding the militants, and residents worried fighting would resume. "There's horror every day here - bombs, shootings," said Suzanne Ajawi, 26, who is in her ninth month of pregnancy. She carried a plastic bag of baby clothes and milk. Following a Cabinet meeting, Information Minister Ghazi Aridi said there was a "clear link" between the violence in Ein el-Hilweh and Nahr el-Bared. Fatah Islam's deputy leader, Abu Hureira, said earlier that Jund al-Sham staged attacks on its own initiative, but claimed that Fatah Islam also had members in Ein el-Hilweh and would open an offensive in the camp. "Soon there will be an official statement in the name of Fatah Islam partisans, and we will start to see an expansion (of the fighting in the north), and there will be a similar military situation there" in Ein el-Hilweh," Abu Hureira said by phone from his hideout in Nahr el-Bared. Associated Press writers Hussein Dakroub in Tripoli and Zeina Karam in Beirut contributed to this report. &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All &copy;2006 The Jackson Sun. Users of this site agree to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/I/ISRAEL_HOLOCAUST_DIARY?SITE=TNJAC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News @ jacksonsun.com Welcome to The Jackson Sun &mdash; Jackson, TN Jun 4, 4:13 PM EDT Polish Girl's Holocaust Diary Unveiled Steps Up Attacks on Hamas Polish Girl's Holocaust Diary Unveiled Amnesty: Watchdog Needed for Israel Aid Money Disbursed to Palestinians Ahmadinejad: Israel Will Be Destroyed Hamas Attack Wounds 4 Israeli Soldiers Conflict in the Middle East JERUSALEM (AP) -- The diary of a 14-year-old Jewish girl, dubbed the "Polish Anne Frank," was unveiled Monday by Israel's Holocaust museum more than 60 years after the teenager vividly described the world crumbling around her as she came of age in a Jewish ghetto. "The rope around us is getting tighter and tighter," Rutka Laskier wrote in 1943, shortly before she was deported to Auschwitz. "I'm turning into an animal waiting to die." Within a few months Rutka was dead and, it seemed, her diary lost. But last year, a Polish friend who had saved the notebook finally came forth, exposing a riveting historical document. "Rutka's Notebook" is both a daily account of the horrors of the Holocaust in Bedzin, Poland, and a scrapbook detailing the life of a teenager in extraordinary circumstances. The 60-page memoir includes innocent adolescent banter, concerns and first loves - combined with a cold analysis of the fate of European Jewry. Some 6 million Jews were killed by the Nazis during World War II, after European Jews were herded into ghettos, banned from most jobs and forced to wear yellow stars to identify them. "I simply can't believe that one day I will be allowed to leave this house without the yellow star. Or even that this war will end one day. If this happens I will probably lose my mind from joy," she wrote on Feb. 5, 1943. "The little faith I used to have has been completely shattered. If God existed, He would have certainly not permitted that human beings be thrown alive into furnaces, and the heads of little toddlers be smashed with gun butts or shoved into sacks and gassed to death." Reports of the gassing of Jews, which were not common knowledge in the West by then, apparently had filtered into the Bedzin ghetto, which was near Auschwitz, Yad Vashem experts said. The following day she opened her entry with a heated description of her hatred toward her Nazi tormentors. But then, in an effortless transition, she described her crush on a boy named Janek and the anticipation of a first kiss. "I think my womanhood has awoken in me. That means, yesterday when I was taking a bath and the water stroked my body, I longed for someone's hands to stroke me," she wrote. "I didn't know what it was, I have never had such sensations until now." Later that day, she shifted back to her harsh reality, describing how she watched as a Nazi soldier tore a Jewish baby away from his mother and killed him with his bare hands. The diary chronicles Rutka's life from January to April 1943. She shared it with her friend Stanislawa Sapinska, who she met after Rutka's family moved into a home owned by Sapinska's family, which had been confiscated by the Nazis to be included in the Bedzin ghetto. Sapinska came to inspect the house and the girls - one Jewish, one Christian - formed a deep bond. When Rutka feared she would not survive, she told her friend about the diary. Sapinska offered to hide it in the basement under the floorboards. After the war, she returned to reclaim it. "She wanted me to save the diary," Sapinska, now in her 80s, recalled Monday. "She said 'I don't know if I will survive, but I want the diary to live on, so that everyone will know what happened to the Jews.'" Sapinska stashed the diary in her home library for more than 60 years. She said it was a precious memento and thought it to be too private to share with others. Only at the behest of her young nephew did she agree to hand it over last year. "He convinced me that it was an important historical artifact," she said in Polish. In 1943, Rutka was the same age as Anne Frank, the Dutch teenager whose Holocaust diary has become one of the most widely read books in the world. Yad Vashem said Rutka's newly discovered diary was authenticated by experts and Holocaust survivors. Rutka's father, Yaakov, was the family's only survivor. He died in 1986. But unlike Anne Frank's father, he kept his painful past inside. After the war, he moved to Israel, where he started a new family. His Israeli daughter, Zahava Sherz, said her father never spoke of his other children, and the diary introduced her to the long-lost family she never knew. "I was struck by this deep connection to Rutka," said Sherz, 57. "I was an only child, and now I suddenly have an older sister. This black hole was suddenly filled, and I immediately fell in love with her." "I have a feeling that I am writing for the last time," Rutka wrote on Feb. 20, 1943, as Nazi soldiers began gathering Jews outside her home for deportation. "I wish it would end already! This torment; this is hell. I try to escape from these thoughts of the next day, but they keep haunting me like nagging flies. If only I could say, it's over, you only die once ... but I can't, because despite all these atrocities, I want to live, and wait for the following day." However, Rutka would write again. Her last entry was dated April 24, 1943, and her last written words were: "I'm very bored. The entire day I'm walking around the room. I have nothing to do." In August, she and her family were sent to Auschwitz, where she is believed to have been killed upon arrival. &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All &copy;2006 The Jackson Sun. Users of this site agree to the
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/M/MISSING_SOLDIERS_VIDEO?SITE=TNJAC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News @ jacksonsun.com Welcome to The Jackson Sun &mdash; Jackson, TN Jun 4, 4:42 PM EDT Group Claims Captured Troops Were Killed Video Claims Missing U.S. Soldiers Are Dead Lieutenant Colonel Christopher Garver, a U-S military spokesman, says there's nothing in the tape to prove the soldiers are dead and may provide a lead. Scene in Baghdad on Memorial Day Searching With Missing Soldiers' Platoon A War Widow's Story The Toll: Coalition Casualties Since March 2003 How MySpace is Changing the Face of War Al-Sadr's Followers Becoming Less Unified end interactive icon section --> Latest photos from Iraq Bush Opens Europe Trip on Jarring Note 7 Turkish Troops Killed in Rebel Attack U.S. Troop Drive Said Faltering in Iraq Bush Brings Pre-Emptive Agenda to Europe U.S. Military Deaths in Iraq at 3,479 Executive Summary: DOD Inspector General on Pre-Iraq War Intelligence Activities(2/9/2007) Unclassified National Intelligence Estimate Summary on Iraq (2/2/2007) Inspector General Report on Iraq Reconstruction (1/31/2007) CAIRO, Egypt (AP) -- Al-Qaida linked insurgents killed three American soldiers after capturing them last month in Iraq, according to a militant video released Monday that claimed to show footage of the ambush. The video offered no proof for its claims. The clip, which was made available to The Associated Press by the Washington-based SITE Institute, showed confused and jerky night battle scenes, and later offered close-ups of two identification cards. It did not show the soldiers. "The Americans sent 4,000 soldiers looking for them," said an unidentified voice on the video, which featured the logo of the media production house of the Islamic State of Iraq. "They were alive and then dead." The body of one of the soldiers was found in Iraq's Euphrates River, but the other two remain missing. Family friends of the missing men said the U.S. military briefed relatives about the video over the weekend. The U.S. military insisted the search for the two missing soldiers would continue. "We condemn the tactics used by these terrorists, and are using all means available to pursue those responsible," said Brig. Gen. Kevin Bergner, the chief military spokesman in Baghdad. "We continue to search and hope that our two missing soldiers will be found alive and in good health. " The video offered no proof for its claims that the soldiers had been killed and buried. The voiceover blamed their deaths on "the American Army and their leaders, who do not care for the feelings of the soldiers' mothers." "And as you refused to deliver the bodies of our killed people, we will not deliver the bodies of your dead, and their end will be beneath the ground, Allah willing," the voice said. A body found May 23 in the Euphrates River was identified by the U.S. military as Pfc. Joseph Anzack Jr., 20, of Torrance, Calif. The missing soldiers have been identified as Spc. Alex R. Jimenez, 25, of Lawrence, Mass., and of Pvt. Byron W. Fouty, 19, of Waterford, Mich. The three vanished after their combat team was ambushed May 12 about 20 miles outside Baghdad. Five others, including an Iraqi, were killed in the ambush, subsequently claimed by al-Qaida. The attack triggered a massive search in the area south of Baghdad known as the "triangle of death" for the rampant insurgent activity there. Gordon Dibler, Fouty's stepfather, said he was holding out hope for the soldiers' safe return: "We're praying, and so far, we don't know for certain that they aren't alive." At the end of the 10-minute 41-second video, the identification cards of the two missing soldiers were shown, with the headline: "Bush is the reason of the loss of your POWs" written on the screen above the cards. SITE, an organization that monitors terrorist groups, did not say how it obtained the video. A card belonging to Anzack was not shown. Along with the identification cards, the footage also showed credit cards, American and Iraqi money and other personal items the militants called "booty." Bergner, the U.S. spokesman, said the footage "doesn't appear to contain any definitive evidence indicating the status of our missing soldiers." The video also showed footage, apparently taken before the ambush, of three masked men standing around a stand displaying a sketch of the area, mapping out the attack plan. One of the three men, who were all dressed in black, talked to the camera and pointed to the sketch. Another stood by him carrying a gun. "I have urged you to bring me American prisoners," said the man, whose name was not given but was identified as one of the militant group's leaders. A Islamic Web site that commonly posts videos from militant groups including the Islamic State of Iraq said in a banner headline that it would show the video within hours, but the video has not yet appeared. After the soldiers disappeared, the Islamic State of Iraq issued Web statements warning the Americans to call off the hunt "if you want their safety." Associated Press writer David N. Goodman contributed to this report from Detroit. &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All &copy;2006 The Jackson Sun. Users of this site agree to the
